

WHIPPERSNAPPER
Whip"per*snap`per, n.

Defn: A diminutive, insignificant, or presumptuous person. [Colloq.]
"Little whippersnappers like you." T. Hughes.

WHIPPING
Whip"ping,

Defn: a & n. from Whip, v. Whipping post, a post to which offenders
are tied, to be legally whipped.

WHIPPLETREE
Whip"ple*tree`, n. Etym: [See Whip, and cf. Whiffletree.]

1. The pivoted or swinging bar to which the traces, or tugs, of a
harness are fastened, and by which a carriage, a plow, or other
implement or vehicle, is drawn; a whiffletree; a swingletree; a
singletree. See Singletree.
[People] cut their own whippletree in the woodlot. Emerson.

2. (Bot.)

Defn: The cornel tree. Chaucer.

WHIP-POOR-WILL
Whip"-poor-will`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: An American bird (Antrostomus vociferus) allied to the
nighthawk and goatsucker; -- so called in imitation of the peculiar
notes which it utters in the evening. [Written also whippowil.]

WHIPSAW
Whip"saw`, n.

Defn: A saw for dividing timber lengthwise, usually set in a frame,
and worked by two persons; also, a fret saw.

WHIP-SHAPED
Whip"-shaped`, a.

Defn: Shaped like the lash of a whip; long, slender, round, and
tapering; as, a whip-shaped root or stem.

WHIPSTAFF
Whip"staff`, n. (Naut.)

Defn: A bar attached to the tiller, for convenience in steering.

WHIPSTALK
Whip"stalk`, n.

Defn: A whipstock.

WHIPSTER
Whip"ster, n. Etym: [Whip + -ster.]

Defn: A nimble little fellow; a whippersnapper.
Every puny whipster gets my sword. Shak.

WHIPSTICK
Whip"stick`, n.

Defn: Whip handle; whipstock.

WHIPSTITCH
Whip"stitch`, n.

1. A tailor; -- so called in contempt.

2. Anything hastily put or stitched together; hence, a hasty
composition. [R.] Dryden.

3. (Agric.)

Defn: The act or process of whipstitching.

WHIPSTITCH
Whip"stitch`, v. t. (Agric.)

Defn: To rafter; to plow in ridges, as land. [Eng.]

WHIPSTOCK
Whip"stock`, n.

Defn: The rod or handle to which the lash of a whip is fastened.

WHIPT
Whipt, imp. & p. p. of Whip.

Defn: Whipped.

WHIP-TOM-KELLY
Whip"-tom`-kel"ly, n. Etym: [So called in imitation of its notes.]
(Zoöl.)

Defn: A vireo (Vireo altiloquus) native of the West Indies and
Florida; -- called also black-whiskered vireo.

WHIPWORM
Whip"worm`, n. Etym: [So called from its shape.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A nematode worm (Trichocephalus dispar) often found parasitic
in the human intestine. Its body is thickened posteriorly, but is
very long and threadlike anteriorly.

WHIR
Whir, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whirred; p. pr. & vb. n. Whirring.] Etym:
[Perhaps of imitative origin; cf. D. hvirre to whirl, and E. hurr,
hurry, whirl.

Defn: To whirl round, or revolve, with a whizzing noise; to fly or
more quickly with a buzzing or whizzing sound; to whiz.
The partridge bursts away on whirring wings. Beattie.

WHIR
Whir, v. t. Etym: [See Whir to whiz.]

Defn: To hurry a long with a whizzing sound. [R.]
This world to me is like a lasting storm, Whirring me from my
friends. Shak.

WHIR
Whir, n.

Defn: A buzzing or whizzing sound produced by rapid or whirling
motion; as, the whir of a partridge; the whir of a spinning wheel.

WHIRL
Whirl, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Whirled; p. pr. & vb. n. Whirling.] Etym:
[OE. whirlen, probably from the Scand.; cf. Icel. & Sw. hvirfla, Dan.
hvirvle; akin to D. wervelen, G. wirbeln, freq. of the verb seen in
Icel. hverfa to turn. sq. root16. See Wharf, and cf. Warble, Whorl.]

1. To turn round rapidly; to cause to rotate with velocity; to make
to revolve.
He whirls his sword around without delay. Dryden.

2. To remove or carry quickly with, or as with, a revolving motion;
to snatch; to harry. Chaucer.
See, see the chariot, and those rushing wheels, That whirled the
prophet up at Chebar flood. Milton.
The passionate heart of the poet is whirl'd into folly. Tennyson.

WHIRL
Whirl, v. i.

1. To be turned round rapidly; to move round with velocity; to
revolve or rotate with great speed; to gyrate. "The whirling year
vainly my dizzy eyes pursue." J. H. Newman.
The wooden engine flies and whirls about. Dryden.

2. To move hastily or swiftly.
But whirled away to shun his hateful sight. Dryden.

WHIRL
Whirl, n. Etym: [Cf. Dan. hvirvel, Sw. hvirfvel, Icel. hvirfill the
crown of the head, G. wirbel whirl, crown of the head, D. wervel. See
Whirl, v. t.]

1. A turning with rapidity or velocity; rapid rotation or
circumvolution; quick gyration; rapid or confusing motion; as, the
whirl of a top; the whirl of a wheel. "In no breathless whirl." J. H.
Newman.
The rapid . . . whirl of things here below interrupt not the
inviolable rest and calmness of the noble beings above. South.

2. Anything that moves with a whirling motion.
He saw Falmouth under gray, iron skies, and whirls of March dust.
Carlyle.

3. A revolving hook used in twisting, as the hooked spindle of a rope
machine, to which the threads to be twisted are attached.

4. (Bot. & Zoöl.)

Defn: A whorl. See Whorl.

WHIRLABOUT
Whirl"a*bout`, n.

Defn: Something that whirls or turns about in a rapid manner; a
whirligig.

WHIRLBAT
Whirl"bat`, n.

Defn: Anything moved with a whirl, as preparatory for a blow, or to
augment the force of it; -- applied by poets to the cestus of ancient
boxers.
The whirlbat and the rapid race shall be Reserved for Cæsar. Dryden.

WHIRL-BLAST
Whirl"-blast`, n.

Defn: A whirling blast or wind.
A whirl-blast from behind the hill. Wordsworth.

WHIRLBONE
Whirl"bone`, n. (Anat.)
(a) The huckle bone. [Obs.]
(b) The patella, or kneepan. [Obs.] Ainsworth.

WHIRLER
Whirl"er, n.

Defn: One who, or that which, whirls.

WHIRLICOTE
Whirl"i*cote, n.

Defn: An open car or chariot. [Obs.]
Of old time coaches were not known in this island, but chariots, or
whirlicotes. Stow.

WHIRLIGIG
Whirl"i*gig, n. Etym: [Whirl + gig.]

1. A child's toy, spun or whirled around like a wheel upon an axis,
or like a top. Johnson.

2. Anything which whirls around, or in which persons or things are
whirled about, as a frame with seats or wooden horses.
With a whirligig of jubilant mosquitoes spinning about each head. G.
W. Cable.

3. A mediæval instrument for punishing petty offenders, being a kind
of wooden cage turning on a pivot, in which the offender was whirled
round with great velocity.

4. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of numerous species of beetles belonging to Gyrinus and
allied genera. The body is firm, oval or boatlike in form, and
usually dark colored with a bronzelike luster. These beetles live
mostly on the surface of water, and move about with great celerity in
a gyrating, or circular, manner, but they are also able to dive and
swim rapidly. The larva is aquatic. Called also weaver, whirlwig, and
whirlwig beetle.

WHIRLING
Whirl"ing,

Defn: a. & n. from Whirl, v. t. Whirling table. (a) (Physics) An
apparatus provided with one or more revolving disks, with weights,
pulleys, and other attachments, for illustrating the phenomena and
laws of centrifugal force, and the like. (b) A potter's wheel.

WHIRLPIT
Whirl"pit`, n.

Defn: A whirlpool. [Obs.] "Raging whirlpits." Sandys.

WHIRLPOOL
Whirl"pool`, n.

1. An eddy or vortex of water; a place in a body of water where the
water moves round in a circle so as to produce a depression or cavity
in the center, into which floating objects may be drawn; any body of
water having a more or less circular motion caused by its flowing in
an irregular channel, by the coming together of opposing currents, or
the like.

2. A sea monster of the whale kind. [Obs.] Spenser.
The Indian Sea breedeth the most and the biggest fishes that are;
among which the whales and whirlpools, called "balænæ," take up in
length as much as four . . . arpents of land. Holland.

WHIRLWIG
Whirl"wig`, n. Etym: [Cf. Earwig.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A whirligig.

WHIRLWIND
Whirl"wind`, n. Etym: [Cf. Icel. hvirfilvindr, Sw. hvirfvelvind, Dan.
hvirvelvind, G. wirbelwind. See Whirl, and Wind, n.]

1. A violent windstorm of limited extent, as the tornado,
characterized by an inward spiral motion of the air with an upward
current in the center; a vortex of air. It usually has a rapid
progressive motion.
The swift dark whirlwind that uproots the woods. And drowns the
villages. Bryant.

Note: Some meteorologists apply the word whirlwind to the larger
rotary storm also, such as cyclones.

2. Fig.: A body of objects sweeping violently onward. "The whirlwind
of hounds and hunters." Macaulay.

WHIRRY
Whir"ry, v. i.

Defn: To whir. [Obs.]

WHIRTLE
Whir"tle, n. (Mech.)

Defn: A perforated steel die through which wires or tubes are drawn
to form them.

WHISK
Whisk, n. Etym: [See Whist, n.]

Defn: A game at cards; whist. [Obs.] Taylor (1630).

WHISK
Whisk, n. Etym: [Probably for wisk, and of Scand. origin; cf. Icel.
visk a wisp; akin to Dan. visk, Sw. viska, D. wisch, OHG. wisc, G.
wisch. See Wisp.]

1. The act of whisking; a rapid, sweeping motion, as of something
light; a sudden motion or quick puff.
This first sad whisk Takes off thy dukedom; thou art but an earl. J.
Fletcher.

2. A small bunch of grass, straw, twigs, hair, or the like, used for
a brush; hence, a brush or small besom, as of broom corn.

3. A small culinary instrument made of wire, or the like, for
whisking or beating eggs, cream, etc. Boyle.

4. A kind of cape, forming part of a woman's dress.
My wife in her new lace whisk. Pepys.

5. An impertinent fellow. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell.

6. A plane used by coopers for evening chines.

WHISK
Whisk, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Whisked; p. pr. & vb. n. Whisking.] Etym:
[Cf. Dan. viske, Sw. viska, G. wischen, D. wisschen. See Whisk, n.]

1. To sweep, brush, or agitate, with a light, rapid motion; as, to
whisk dust from a table; to whisk the white of eggs into a froth.

2. To move with a quick, sweeping motion.
He that walks in gray, whisking his riding rod. J. Fletcher.
I beg she would not impale worms, nor whisk carp out of one element
into another. Walpole.

WHISK
Whisk, v. i.

Defn: To move nimbly at with velocity; to make a sudden agile
movement.

WHISKER
Whisk"er, n.

1. One who, or that which, whisks, or moves with a quick, sweeping
motion.

2. Formerly, the hair of the upper lip; a mustache; -- usually in the
plural.
Hoary whiskers and a forky beard. Pope.

3. pl.

Defn: That part of the beard which grows upon the sides of the face,
or upon the chin, or upon both; as, side whiskers; chin whiskers.

4. A hair of the beard.

5. One of the long, projecting hairs growing at the sides of the
mouth of a cat, or other animal.

6. pl. (Naut.)

Defn: Iron rods extending on either side of the bowsprit, to spread,
or guy out, the stays, etc.

WHISKERED
Whisk"ered, a.

1. Formed into whiskers; furnished with whiskers; having or wearing
whiskers.
Our forefathers, a grave, whiskered race. Cowper.

2. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Having elongated hairs, feathers, or bristles on the cheeks.
The whiskered vermin race. Grainger.

WHISKERLESS
Whisk"er*less, a.

Defn: Being without whiskers.

WHISKET
Whis"ket, n. Etym: [Cf. Wisket.]

1. A basket; esp., a straw provender basket. [Prov. Eng.] Halliwell.

2. (Mach.)

Defn: A small lathe for turning wooden pins.

WHISKEY
Whis"key, n.

Defn: Same as Whisky, a liquor.

WHISKEY; WHISKY
Whis"key, Whis"ky, n.; pl. Whiskeys or Whiskies. Etym: [See Whisk, v.
t. & n.]

Defn: A light carriage built for rapid motion; -- called also tim-
whiskey.

WHISKIN
Whisk"in, n.

Defn: A shallow drinking bowl. [Prov. Eng.] Ray.

WHISKING
Whisk"ing, a.

1. Sweeping along lightly.

2. Large; great. [Prov. Eng.]

WHISKY; WHISKEY
Whis"ky, Whis"key, n. Etym: [Ir. or Gael. uisge water (perhaps akin
to E. wash, water) in uisgebeatha whiskey, properly, water of life.
Cf. Usquebaugh.]

Defn: An intoxicating liquor distilled from grain, potatoes, etc.,
especially in Scotland, Ireland, and the United States. In the United
States, whisky is generally distilled from maize, rye, or wheat, but
in Scotland and Ireland it is often made from malted barley. Bourbon
whisky, corn whisky made in Bourbon County, Kentucky.
 -- Crooked whisky. See under Crooked.
 -- Whisky Jack (Zoöl.), the Canada jay (Perisoreus Canadensis). It
is noted for its fearless and familiar habits when it frequents the
camps of lumbermen in the winter season. Its color is dull grayish
blue, lighter beneath. Called also moose bird.

WHISKYFIED; WHISKEYFIED
Whis"ky*fied, Whis"key*fied, a. Etym: [Whisky + -fy.]

Defn: Drunk with whisky; intoxicated. [Humorous] Thackeray.

WHISKY RING; WHISKEY RING
Whisky, or Whiskey, Ring . (U. S. Hist.)

Defn: A conspiracy of distillers and government officials during the
administration of President Grant to defraud the government of the
excise taxes. The frauds were detected in 1875 through the efforts of
the Secretary of the Treasury. B. H. Bristow, and most of the
offenders were convicted.

WHISP
Whisp, n.

Defn: See Wisp.

WHISP
Whisp, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A flock of snipe.

WHISPER
Whis"per, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whispered; p. pr. & vb. n. Whispering.]
Etym: [AS. hwisprian; akin to G. wispern, wispeln, OHG. hwispal,
Icel. hviskra, Sw. hviska, Dan. hviske; of imitative origin. Cf.
Whistle.]

1. To speak softly, or under the breath, so as to be heard only by
one near at hand; to utter words without sonant breath; to talk
without that vibration in the larynx which gives sonorous, or vocal,
sound. See Whisper, n.

2. To make a low, sibilant sound or noise.
The hollow, whispering breeze. Thomson.

3. To speak with suspicion, or timorous caution; to converse in
whispers, as in secret plotting.
All that hate me whisper together against me. Ps. xli. 7.

WHISPER
Whis"per, v. t.

1. To utter in a low and nonvocal tone; to say under the breath;
hence, to mention privately and confidentially, or in a whisper.
They might buzz and whisper it one to another. Bentley.

2. To address in a whisper, or low voice. [Archaic]
And whisper one another in the ear. Shak.
Where gentlest breezes whisper souls distressed. Keble.

3. To prompt secretly or cautiously; to inform privately. [Obs.] "He
came to whisper Wolsey." Shak.

WHISPER
Whis"per, n.

1. A low, soft, sibilant voice or utterance, which can be heard only
by those near at hand; voice or utterance that employs only breath
sound without tone, friction against the edges of the vocal cords and
arytenoid cartilages taking the place of the vibration of the cords
that produces tone; sometimes, in a limited sense, the sound produced
by such friction as distinguished from breath sound made by friction
against parts of the mouth. See Voice, n., 2, and Guide to
Pronunciation, §§ 5, 153, 154.
The inward voice or whisper can not give a tone. Bacon.
Soft whispers through the assembly went. Dryden.

2. A cautious or timorous speech. South.

3. Something communicated in secret or by whispering; a suggestion or
insinuation.

4. A low, sibilant sound. "The whispers of the leaves." Tennyson.

WHISPERER
Whis"per*er, n.

1. One who whispers.

2. A tattler; one who tells secrets; a conveyer of intelligence
secretly; hence; a backbiter; one who slanders secretly. Prov. xvi.
28.

WHISPERING
Whis"per*ing,

Defn: a. & n. from Whisper. v. t. Whispering gallery, or Whispering
dome, one of such a form that sounds produced in certain parts of it
are concentrated by reflection from the walls to another part, so
that whispers or feeble sounds are audible at a much greater distance
than under ordinary circumstances.

WHISPERINGLY
Whis"per*ing*ly, adv.

Defn: In a whisper, or low voice; in a whispering manner; with
whispers. Tennyson.

WHISPEROUSLY
Whis"per*ous*ly, adv.

Defn: Whisperingly. [R.]

WHIST
Whist, interj. Etym: [Cf. G. st! pst! bst! Hist.]

Defn: Be silent; be still; hush; silence.

WHIST
Whist, n. Etym: [From Whist, interj.]

Defn: A certain game at cards; -- so called because it requires
silence and close attention. It is played by four persons (those who
sit opposite each other being partners) with a complete pack of
fifty-two cards. Each player has thirteen cards, and when these are
played out, he hand is finished, and the cards are again shuffled and
distributed.

Note: Points are scored for the tricks taken in excess of six, and
for the honors held. In long whist, now seldom played, ten points
make the game; in short whist, now usually played in England, five
points make the game. In American whist, so-called, honors are not
counted, and seven points by tricks make the game.

WHIST
Whist, v. t. Etym: [From Whist, interj.]

Defn: To hush or silence. [Obs.] Spenser.

WHIST
Whist, v. i.

Defn: To be or become silent or still; to be hushed or mute. [R.]
Surrey.

WHIST
Whist, a. Etym: [Properly p. p. of whist, v.]

Defn: Not speaking; not making a noise; silent; mute; still; quiet.
"So whist and dead a silence." Sir J. Harrington.
The winds, with wonder whist, Smoothly the waters kissed. Milton.

Note: This adjective generally follows its noun, or is used
predicatively.

WHISTLE
Whis"tle, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whistled; p. pr. & vb. n. Whistling.]
Etym: [AS. hwistlian; akin to Sw. hvissla, Dan. hvisle, Icel. hvisla
to whisper, and E. whisper. Whisper.]

1. To make a kind of musical sound, or series of sounds, by forcing
the breath through a small orifice formed by contracting the lips;
also, to emit a similar sound, or series of notes, from the mouth or
beak, as birds.
The weary plowman leaves the task of day, And, trudging homeward,
whistles on the way. Gay.

2. To make a shrill sound with a wind or steam instrument, somewhat
like that made with the lips; to blow a sharp, shrill tone.

3. To sound shrill, or like a pipe; to make a sharp, shrill sound;
as, a bullet whistles through the air.
The wild winds whistle, and the billows roar. Pope.

WHISTLE
Whis"tle, v. t.

1. To form, utter, or modulate by whistling; as, to whistle a tune or
an air.

2. To send, signal, or call by a whistle.
He chanced to miss his dog; we stood still till he had whistled him
up. Addison.
To whistle off. (a) To dismiss by a whistle; -- a term in hawking.
"AS a long-winged hawk when he is first whistled off the fist, mounts
aloft." Burton. (b) Hence, in general, to turn loose; to abandon; to
dismiss.
I 'ld whistle her off, and let her down the wind To prey at fortune.
Shak.

Note: "A hawk seems to have been usually sent off in this way,
against the wind when sent in search of prey; with or down the wind,
when turned loose, and abandoned." Nares.

WHISTLE
Whis"tle, n. Etym: [AS. hwistle a pipe, flute, whistle. See Whistle,
v. i.]

1. A sharp, shrill, more or less musical sound, made by forcing the
breath through a small orifice of the lips, or through or instrument
which gives a similar sound; the sound used by a sportsman in calling
his dogs; the shrill note of a bird; as, the sharp whistle of a boy,
or of a boatswain's pipe; the blackbird's mellow whistle.
Might we but hear The folded flocks, penned in their wattled cotes, .
. . Or whistle from the lodge. Milton.
The countryman could not forbear smiling, . . . and by that means
lost his whistle. Spectator.
They fear his whistle, and forsake the seas. Dryden.

2. The shrill sound made by wind passing among trees or through
crevices, or that made by bullet, or the like, passing rapidly
through the air; the shrill noise (much used as a signal, etc.) made
by steam or gas escaping through a small orifice, or impinging
against the edge of a metallic bell or cup.

3. An instrument in which gas or steam forced into a cavity, or
against a thin edge, produces a sound more or less like that made by
one who whistles through the compressed lips; as, a child's whistle;
a boatswain's whistle; a steam whistle (see Steam whistle, under
Steam).
The bells she jingled, and the whistle blew. Pope.

4. The mouth and throat; -- so called as being the organs of
whistling. [Colloq.]
So was her jolly whistle well ywet. Chaucer.
Let's drink the other cup to wet our whistles. Walton.
Whistle duck (Zoöl.), the American golden-eye.

WHISTLEFISH
Whis"tle*fish`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A gossat, or rockling; -- called also whistler, three-bearded
rockling, sea loach, and sorghe.

WHISTLER
Whis"tler, n. Etym: [AS. hwistlere.]

1. One who, or that which, whistles, or produces or a whistling
sound.

2. (Zoöl.)
(a) The ring ousel.
(b) The widgeon. [Prov. Eng.]
(c) The golden-eye.
(d) The golden plover and the gray plover.

3. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The hoary, or northern, marmot (Arctomys pruinosus).

4. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The whistlefish.

WHISTLEWING
Whis"tle*wing`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The American golden-eye.

WHISTLEWOOD
Whis"tle*wood`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: The moosewood, or striped maple. See Maple.

WHISTLING
Whis"tling,

Defn: a. & n. from Whistle, v. Whistling buoy. (Naut.) See under
Buoy.
 -- Whistling coot (Zoöl.), the American black scoter.
 -- Whistling Dick. (Zoöl.) (a) An Australian shrike thrush
(Colluricincla Selbii). (b) The song thrush. [Prov. Eng.] --
Whistling duck. (Zoöl.) (a) The golden-eye. (b) A tree duck.
 -- Whistling eagle (Zoöl.), a small Australian eagle (Haliastur
sphenurus); -- called also whistling hawk, and little swamp eagle.
 -- Whistling plover. (Zoöl.) (a) The golden plover. (b) The black-
bellied, or gray, plover.
 -- Whistling snipe (Zoöl.), the American woodcock.
 -- Whistling swan. (Zoöl.) (a) The European whooper swan; -- called
also wild swan, and elk. (b) An American swan (Olor columbianus). See
under Swan.
 -- Whistling teal (Zoöl.), a tree duck, as Dendrocygna awsuree of
India.
 -- Whistling thrush. (Zoöl.) (a) Any one of several species of
singing birds of the genus Myiophonus, native of Asia, Australia, and
the East Indies. They are generally black, glossed with blue, and
have a patch of bright blue on each shoulder. Their note is a loud
and clear whistle. (b) The song thrush. [Prov. Eng.]

WHISTLINGLY
Whis"tling*ly, adv.

Defn: In a whistling manner; shrilly.

WHISTLY
Whist"ly, adv.

Defn: In a whist manner; silently. [Obs.]

WHIT
Whit, n. Etym: [OE. wight, wiht, AS. wiht a creature, a thing. See
Wight, and cf. Aught, Naught.]

Defn: The smallest part or particle imaginable; a bit; a jot; an
iota; -- generally used in an adverbial phrase in a negative
sentence. "Samuel told him every whit." 1 Sam. iii. 18. "Every whit
as great." South.
So shall I no whit be behind in duty. Shak.
It does not me a whit displease. Cowley.

WHITE
White, a. [Compar. Whiter; superl. Whitest.] Etym: [OE. whit, AS. hw;
akin to OFries. and OS. hwit, D. wit, G. weiss, OHG. wiz, hwiz, Icel.
hvitr, Sw. hvit, Dan. hvid, Goth. hweits, Lith. szveisti, to make
bright, Russ. sviet' light, Skr. white, to be bright. Wheat,
Whitsunday.]

1. Reflecting to the eye all the rays of the spectrum combined; not
tinted with any of the proper colors or their mixtures; having the
color of pure snow; snowy; -- the opposite of Ant: black or dark; as,
white paper; a white skin. "Pearls white." Chaucer.
White as the whitest lily on a stream. Longfellow.

2. Destitute of color, as in the cheeks, or of the tinge of blood
color; pale; pallid; as, white with fear.
Or whispering with white lips, "The foe! They come! they come!"
Byron.

3. Having the color of purity; free from spot or blemish, or from
guilt or pollution; innocent; pure.
White as thy fame, and as thy honor clear. Dryden.
No whiter page than Addison's remains. Pope.

4. Gray, as from age; having silvery hair; hoary.
Your high engendered battles 'gainst a head So old and white as this.
Shak.

5. Characterized by freedom from that which disturbs, and the like;
fortunate; happy; favorable.
On the whole, however, the dominie reckoned this as one of the white
days of his life. Sir W. Scott.

6. Regarded with especial favor; favorite; darling.
Come forth, my white spouse. Chaucer.
I am his white boy, and will not be gullet. Ford.

Note: White is used in many self-explaining compounds, as white-
backed, white-bearded, white-footed. White alder. (Bot.) See Sweet
pepper bush, under Pepper.
 -- White ant (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of social
pseudoneuropterous insects of the genus Termes. These insects are
very abundant in tropical countries, and form large and complex
communities consisting of numerous asexual workers of one or more
kinds, of large-headed asexual individuals called soldiers, of one or
more queens (or fertile females) often having the body enormously
distended by the eggs, and, at certain seasons of numerous winged
males, together with the larvæ and pupæ of each kind in various
stages of development. Many of the species construct large and
complicated nests, sometimes in the form of domelike structures
rising several feet above the ground and connected with extensive
subterranean galleries and chambers. In their social habits they
closely resemble the true ants. They feed upon animal and vegetable
substances of various kinds, including timber, and are often very
destructive to buildings and furniture.
 -- White arsenic (Chem.), arsenious oxide, As2O3, a substance of a
white color, and vitreous adamantine luster, having an astringent,
sweetish taste. It is a deadly poison.
 -- White bass (Zoöl.), a fresh-water North American bass (Roccus
chrysops) found in the Great Likes.
 -- White bear (Zoöl.), the polar bear. See under Polar.
 -- White blood cell. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte.
 -- White brand (Zoöl.), the snow goose.
 -- White brass, a white alloy of copper; white copper.
 -- White campion. (Bot.) (a) A kind of catchfly (Silene stellata)
with white flowers. (b) A white-flowered Lychnis (Lychnis
vespertina).
 -- White canon (R. C. Ch.), a Premonstratensian.
 -- White caps, the members of a secret organization in various of
the United States, who attempt to drive away or reform obnoxious
persons by lynch-law methods. They appear masked in white.
 -- White cedar (Bot.), an evergreen tree of North America (Thuja
occidentalis), also the related Cupressus thyoides, or Chamæcyparis
sphæroidea, a slender evergreen conifer which grows in the so-called
cedar swamps of the Northern and Atlantic States. Both are much
valued for their durable timber. In California the name is given to
the Libocedrus decurrens, the timber of which is also useful, though
often subject to dry rot. Goodale. The white cedar of Demerara,
Guiana, etc., is a lofty tree (Icica, or Bursera, altissima) whose
fragrant wood is used for canoes and cabinetwork, as it is not
attacked by insect.
 -- White cell. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte.
 -- White cell-blood (Med.), leucocythæmia.
 -- White clover (Bot.), a species of small perennial clover bearing
white flowers. It furnishes excellent food for cattle and horses, as
well as for the honeybee. See also under Clover.
 -- White copper, a whitish alloy of copper. See German silver, under
German.
 -- White copperas (Min.), a native hydrous sulphate of iron;
coquimbite.
 -- White coral (Zoöl.), an ornamental branched coral (Amphihelia
oculata) native of the Mediterranean.
 -- White corpuscle. (Physiol.) See Leucocyte.
 -- White cricket (Zoöl.), the tree cricket.
 -- White crop, a crop of grain which loses its green color, or
becomes white, in ripening, as wheat, rye, barley, and oats, as
distinguished from a green crop, or a root crop.
 -- White currant (Bot.), a variety of the common red currant, having
white berries.
 -- White daisy (Bot.), the oxeye daisy. See under Daisy.
 -- White damp, a kind of poisonous gas encountered in coal mines.
Raymond.
 -- White elephant (Zoöl.), a whitish, or albino, variety of the
Asiatic elephant.
 -- White elm (Bot.), a majestic tree of North America (Ulmus
Americana), the timber of which is much used for hubs of wheels, and
for other purposes.
 -- White ensign. See Saint George's ensign, under Saint.
 -- White feather, a mark or symbol of cowardice. See To show the
white feather, under Feather, n.
 -- White fir (Bot.), a name given to several coniferous trees of the
Pacific States, as Abies grandis, and A. concolor.
 -- White flesher (Zoöl.), the ruffed grouse. See under Ruffed.
[Canada] -- White frost. See Hoarfrost.
 -- White game (Zoöl.), the white ptarmigan.
 -- White garnet (Min.), leucite.
 -- White grass (Bot.), an American grass (Leersia Virginica) with
greenish-white paleæ.
 -- White grouse. (Zoöl.) (a) The white ptarmigan. (b) The prairie
chicken. [Local, U. S.] -- White grub (Zoöl.), the larva of the June
bug and other allied species. These grubs eat the roots of grasses
and other plants, and often do much damage.
 -- White hake (Zoöl.), the squirrel hake. See under Squirrel.
 -- White hawk, or kite (Zoöl.), the hen harrier.
 -- White heat, the temperature at which bodies become incandescent,
and appear white from the bright light which they emit.
 -- White hellebore (Bot.), a plant of the genus Veratrum (V. album)
See Hellebore, 2.
 -- White herring, a fresh, or unsmoked, herring, as distinguished
from a red, or cured, herring. [R.] Shak.
 -- White hoolet (Zoöl.), the barn owl. [Prov. Eng.] -- White horses
(Naut.), white-topped waves; whitecaps.
 -- The White House. See under House.
 -- White ibis (Zoöl.), an American ibis (Guara alba) having the
plumage pure white, except the tips of the wings, which are black. It
inhabits tropical America and the Southern United States. Called also
Spanish curlew.
 -- White iron. (a) Thin sheets of iron coated with tin; tinned iron.
(b) A hard, silvery-white cast iron containing a large proportion of
combined carbon.
 -- White iron pyrites (Min.), marcasite.
 -- White land, a tough clayey soil, of a whitish hue when dry, but
blackish after rain. [Eng.] -- White lark (Zoöl.), the snow bunting.
 -- White lead. (a) A carbonate of lead much used in painting, and
for other purposes; ceruse. (b) (Min.) Native lead carbonate;
cerusite.
 -- White leather, buff leather; leather tanned with alum and salt.
 -- White leg (Med.), milk leg. See under Milk.
 -- White lettuce (Bot.), rattlesnake root. See under Rattlesnake.
 -- White lie. See under Lie.
 -- White light. (a) (Physics) Light having the different colors in
the same proportion as in the light coming directly from the sun,
without having been decomposed, as by passing through a prism. See
the Note under Color, n., 1. (b) A kind of firework which gives a
brilliant white illumination for signals, etc.
 -- White lime, a solution or preparation of lime for whitewashing;
whitewash.
 -- White line (Print.), a void space of the breadth of a line, on a
printed page; a blank line.
 -- White meat. (a) Any light-colored flesh, especially of poultry.
(b) Food made from milk or eggs, as butter, cheese, etc.
Driving their cattle continually with them, and feeding only upon
their milk and white meats. Spenser.
-- White merganser (Zoöl.), the smew.
 -- White metal. (a) Any one of several white alloys, as pewter,
britannia, etc. (b) (Metal.) A fine grade of copper sulphide obtained
at a certain stage in copper smelting.
 -- White miller. (Zoöl.) (a) The common clothes moth. (b) A common
American bombycid moth (Spilosoma Virginica) which is pure white with
a few small black spots; -- called also ermine moth, and virgin moth.
See Woolly bear, under Woolly.
 -- White money, silver money.
 -- White mouse (Zoöl.), the albino variety of the common mouse.
 -- White mullet (Zoöl.), a silvery mullet (Mugil curema) ranging
from the coast of the United States to Brazil; -- called also blue-
back mullet, and liza.
 -- White nun (Zoöl.), the smew; -- so called from the white crest
and the band of black feathers on the back of its head, which give
the appearance of a hood.
 -- White oak. (Bot.) See under Oak.
 -- White owl. (Zoöl.) (a) The snowy owl. (b) The barn owl.
 -- White partridge (Zoöl.), the white ptarmigan.
 -- White perch. (Zoöl.) (a) A North American fresh-water bass
(Morone Americana) valued as a food fish. (b) The croaker, or fresh-
water drum. (c) Any California surf fish.
 -- White pine. (Bot.) See the Note under Pine.
 -- White poplar (Bot.), a European tree (Populus alba) often
cultivated as a shade tree in America; abele.
 -- White poppy (Bot.), the opium-yielding poppy. See Poppy.
 -- White powder, a kind of gunpowder formerly believed to exist, and
to have the power of exploding without noise. [Obs.]
A pistol charged with white powder. Beau. & Fl.
-- White precipitate. (Old Chem.) See under Precipitate.
 -- White rabbit. (Zoöl.) (a) The American northern hare in its
winter pelage. (b) An albino rabbit.
 -- White rent, (a) (Eng. Law) Formerly, rent payable in silver; --
opposed to black rent. See Blackmail, n., 3. (b) A rent, or duty, of
eight pence, payable yearly by every tinner in Devon and Cornwall to
the Duke of Cornwall, as lord of the soil. [Prov. Eng.] -- White
rhinoceros. (Zoöl.) (a) The one-horned, or Indian, rhinoceros
(Rhinoceros Indicus). See Rhinoceros. (b) The umhofo.
 -- White ribbon, the distinctive badge of certain organizations for
the promotion of temperance or of moral purity; as, the White-ribbon
Army.
 -- White rope (Naut.), untarred hemp rope.
 -- White rot. (Bot.) (a) Either of several plants, as marsh
pennywort and butterwort, which were thought to produce the disease
called rot in sheep. (b) A disease of grapes. See White rot, under
Rot.
 -- White sage (Bot.), a white, woolly undershrub (Eurotia lanata) of
Western North America; -- called also winter fat.
 -- White salmon (Zoöl.), the silver salmon.
 -- White salt, salt dried and calcined; decrepitated salt.
 -- White scale (Zoöl.), a scale insect (Aspidiotus Nerii) injurious
to the orange tree. See Orange scale, under Orange.
 -- White shark (Zoöl.), a species of man-eating shark. See under
Shark.
 -- White softening. (Med.) See Softening of the brain, under
Softening.
 -- White spruce. (Bot.) See Spruce, n., 1.
 -- White squall (Naut.), a sudden gust of wind, or furious blow,
which comes up without being marked in its approach otherwise than by
whitecaps, or white, broken water, on the surface of the sea.
 -- White staff, the badge of the lord high treasurer of England.
Macaulay.
 -- White stork (Zoöl.), the common European stork.
 -- White sturgeon. (Zoöl.) See Shovelnose (d).
 -- White sucker. (Zoöl.) (a) The common sucker. (b) The common red
horse (Moxostoma macrolepidotum).
 -- White swelling (Med.), a chronic swelling of the knee, produced
by a strumous inflammation of the synovial membranes of the kneejoint
and of the cancellar texture of the end of the bone forming the
kneejoint; -- applied also to a lingering chronic swelling of almost
any kind.
 -- White tombac. See Tombac.
 -- White trout (Zoöl.), the white weakfish, or silver squeteague
(Cynoscion nothus), of the Southern United States.
 -- White vitriol (Chem.), hydrous sulphate of zinc. See White
vitriol, under Vitriol.
 -- White wagtail (Zoöl.), the common, or pied, wagtail.
 -- White wax, beeswax rendered white by bleaching.
 -- White whale (Zoöl.), the beluga.
 -- White widgeon (Zoöl.), the smew.
 -- White wine. any wine of a clear, transparent color, bordering on
white, as Madeira, sherry, Lisbon, etc.; -- distinguished from wines
of a deep red color, as port and Burgundy. "White wine of Lepe."
Chaucer.
 -- White witch, a witch or wizard whose supernatural powers are
supposed to be exercised for good and beneficent purposes. Addison.
Cotton Mather.
 -- White wolf. (Zoöl.) (a) A light-colored wolf (Canis laniger)
native of Thibet; -- called also chanco, golden wolf, and Thibetan
wolf. (b) The albino variety of the gray wolf.
 -- White wren (Zoöl.), the willow warbler; -- so called from the
color of the under parts.

WHITE
White, n.

1. The color of pure snow; one of the natural colors of bodies, yet
not strictly a color, but a composition of all colors; the opposite
of black; whiteness. See the Note under Color, n., 1.
Finely attired in a of white. Shak.

2. Something having the color of snow; something white, or nearly so;
as, the white of the eye.

3. Specifically, the central part of the butt in archery, which was
formerly painted white; the center of a mark at which a missile is
shot.
'T was I won the wager, though you hit the white. Shak.

4. A person with a white skin; a member of the white, or Caucasian,
races of men.

5. A white pigment; as, Venice white.

6. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of numerous species of butterflies belonging to Pieris,
and allied genera in which the color is usually white. See Cabbage
butterfly, under Cabbage. Black and white. See under Black.
 -- Flake white, Paris white, etc. See under Flack, Paris, etc.
 -- White of a seed (Bot.), the albumen. See Albumen, 2.
 -- White of egg, the viscous pellucid fluid which surrounds the yolk
in an egg, particularly in the egg of a fowl. In a hen's egg it is
alkaline, and contains about 86 per cent of water and 14 per cent of
solid matter, the greater portion of which is egg albumin. It
likewise contains a small amount of globulin, and traces of fats and
sugar, with some inorganic matter. Heated above 60º C. it coagulates
to a solid mass, owing to the albumin which it contains. Parr.
 -- White of the eye (Anat.), the white part of the ball of the eye
surrounding the transparent cornea.

WHITE
White, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Whited; p. pr. & vb. n. Whiting.] Etym:
[AS. hwitan.]

Defn: To make white; to whiten; to whitewash; to bleach.
Whited sepulchers, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are
within full of . . . uncleanness. Matt. xxiii. 27.
So as no fuller on earth can white them. Mark. ix. 3.

WHITEBACK
White"back`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The canvasback.

WHITEBAIT
White"bait`, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) The young of several species of herrings, especially of the
common herring, esteemed a great delicacy by epicures in England.
(b) A small translucent fish (Salanx Chinensis) abundant at certain
seasons on the coasts of China and Japan, and used in the same manner
as the European whitebait.

WHITEBEAM
White"beam`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: The common beam tree of England (Pyrus Aria); -- so called from
the white, woolly under surface of the leaves.

WHITEBEARD
White"beard`, n.

Defn: An old man; a graybeard.

WHITEBELLY
White"bel`ly, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) The American widgeon, or baldpate.
(b) The prairie chicken.

WHITEBILL
White"bill`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The American coot.

WHITE-BLAZE
White"-blaze`, n.

Defn: See White-face.

WHITEBLOW
White"blow`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: Same as Whitlow grass, under Whitlow.

WHITEBOY
White"boy`, n.

1. A favorite. [Obs.] See White, a., 6. "One of God's whiteboys."
Bunyan.

2. One of an association of poor Roman catholics which arose in
Ireland about 1760, ostensibly to resist the collection of tithes,
the members of which were so called from the white shirts they wore
in their nocturnal raids.

WHITEBOYISM
White"boy`ism, n.

Defn: The conduct or principle of the Whiteboys.

WHITECAP
White"cap`, n.

1. (Zoöl.)
(a) The European redstart; -- so called from its white forehead.
(b) The whitethroat; -- so called from its gray head.
(c) The European tree sparrow.

2. A wave whose crest breaks into white foam, as when the wind is
freshening.

WHITECOAT
White"coat`, n.

Defn: The skin of a newborn seal; also, the seal itself. [Sealers'
Cant]

WHITE-EAR
White"-ear`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The wheatear.

WHITE ELEPHANT
White elephant.

Defn: Something requiring much care and expense and yielding little
profit; any burdensome possession. [Slang]

WHITE-EYE
White"-eye`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of several species of small Old World singing of the
genus Zosterops, as Zosterops palpebrosus of India, and Z.
coerulescens of Australia. The eyes are encircled by a ring of white
feathers, whence the name. Called also bush creeper, and white-eyed
tit.

WHITE-FACE
White"-face`, n.

Defn: A white mark in the forehead of a horse, descending almost to
the nose; -- called also white-blaze.

WHITEFISH
White"fish`, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) Any one of several species of Coregonus, a genus of excellent
food fishes allied to the salmons. They inhabit the lakes of the
colder parts of North America, Asia, and Europe. The largest and most
important American species (C. clupeiformis) is abundant in the Great
Lakes, and in other lakes farther north. Called also lake whitefish,
and Oswego bass.
(b) The menhaden.
(c) The beluga, or white whale.

Note: Various other fishes are locally called whitefish, as the
silver salmon, the whiting (a), the yellowtail, and the young of the
bluefish (Pomatomus saltatrix).

WHITEFLAW
White"flaw`, n. Etym: [See Whitlow.] (Med.)

Defn: A whitlow. [Obs.] Holland.

WHITE FLY
White fly.

Defn: Any one of numerous small injurious hemipterous insects of the
genus Aleyrodes, allied to scale insects. They are usually covered
with a white or gray powder.

WHITE-FOOT
White"-foot`, n. (Far.)

Defn: A white mark on the foot of a horse, between the fetlock and
the coffin.

WHITE FRIAR
White" fri`ar. (Eccl.)

Defn: A mendicant monk of the Carmelite order, so called from the
white cloaks worn by the order. See Carmelite.

WHITE-FRONTED
White`-front"ed, a.

Defn: Having a white front; as, the white-fronted lemur. White-
fronted goose (Zoöl.), the white brant, or snow goose. See Snow
goose, under Snow.

WHITEHEAD
White"head`, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) The blue-winged snow goose.
(b) The surf scoter.

WHITEHEAD TORPEDO; WHITEHEAD
White"head` tor*pe"do, or White"head`, n.

Defn: A form of self-propelling torpedo.

WHITE-HEART
White"-heart`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: A somewhat heart-shaped cherry with a whitish skin.

WHITE HORSE
White horse.

Defn: A large mass of tough sinewy substance in the head of sperm
whales, just above the upper jaw and extending in streaks into the
junk above it. It resembles blubber, but contains no oil. Also, the
part of the head in which it occurs.

WHITE-HOT
White"-hot`, a.

Defn: White with heat; heated to whiteness, or incandescence.

WHITE-LIMED
White"-limed`, a.

Defn: Whitewashed or plastered with lime. "White-limed walls." Shak.

WHITE LIST
White list.
 (a) A list of business concerns regarded as worthy of patronage by
reason of compliance with certain conditions, as in regard to
treatment of employees; as, the white list of the Consumers' League.
[Cant]
 (b) (New York Stock Exchange) The official list of all transactions,
published daily on white paper, divided into sales from 10 to 12, 12
to 2, and 2 to 3.

WHITE-LIVERED
White"-liv`ered, a.

Defn: Having a pale look; feeble; hence, cowardly; pusillanimous;
dastardly.
They must not be milksops, nor white-livered knights. Latimer.

WHITELY
White"ly, a.

Defn: Like, or coming near to, white. [Obs.]

WHITE MUSTARD
White mustard.

Defn: A kind of mustard (Sinapis alba) with rough-hairy foliage, a
long-beaked hispid pod, and pale seeds, which yield mustard and
mustard oil. The plant is also grown for forage.

WHITEN
Whit"en, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whitened; p. pr. & vb. n. Whitening.]
Etym: [OE. whitenen; cf. Icel. hvitna.]

Defn: To grow white; to turn or become white or whiter; as, the hair
whitens with age; the sea whitens with foam; the trees in spring
whiten with blossoms.

WHITEN
Whit"en, v. t.

Defn: To make white; to bleach; to blanch; to whitewash; as, to
whiten a wall; to whiten cloth.
The broad stream of the Foyle then whitened by vast flocks of wild
swans. Macaulay.

Syn.
 -- See Blanch.

WHITENER
Whit"en*er, n.

Defn: One who, or that which, whitens; a bleacher; a blancher; a
whitewasher.

WHITENESS
White"ness, n. Etym: [AS. hwitness.]

1. The quality or state of being white; white color, or freedom from
darkness or obscurity on the surface. Chaucer.

2. Want of a sanguineous tinge; paleness; as from terror, grief, etc.
"The whiteness in thy cheek." Shak.

3. Freedom from stain or blemish; purity; cleanness.
He had kept The whiteness of his soul, and thus men o'er him wept.
Byron.

4. Nakedness. [Obs.] Chapman.

5. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A flock of swans.

WHITENING
Whit"en*ing, n.

1. The act or process of making or becoming white.

2. That which is used to render white; whiting. [R.] Whitening stone,
a sharpening and polishing stone used by cutlers; also, a finishing
grindstone of fine texture.

WHITE PERSON
White person.

Defn: A person of the Caucasian race (6 Fed. Rep. 256). In the time
of slavery in the United States white person was generally construed
as a person without admixture of colored blood. In various statutes
and decisions in different States since 1865 white person is
construed as in effect: one not having any negro blood (Ark., Okla.);
one having less than one eighth of negro blood (Ala., Fla., Ga.,
Ind., Ky., Md., Minn., Miss., Mo., N.C., S.C., Tenn., Tex.); one
having less than one fourth (Mich., Neb., Ore., Va.); one having less
than one half (Ohio).

WHITE PLAGUE
White plague.

Defn: Tuberculosis, esp. of the lungs.

WHITE-POT
White"-pot`, n.

Defn: A kind of food made of milk or cream, eggs, sugar, bread, etc.,
baked in a pot. King.

WHITERUMP
White"rump`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The American black-tailed godwit.

WHITES
Whites, n. pl.

1. (Med.)

Defn: Leucorrh

2. The finest flour made from white wheat.

3. Cloth or garments of a plain white color.

WHITESIDE
White"side`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The golden-eye.

WHITE SLAVE
White slave.

Defn: A woman held in involuntary confinement for purposes of
prostitution; loosely, any woman forced into unwilling prostitution.

WHITE SLAVER
White slaver.

Defn: A person engaged in procuring or holding a woman or women for
unwilling prostitution.

WHITE SLAVING
White slaving.

Defn: The action of one who procures or holds a woman or women for
unwilling prostitution.

WHITESMITH
White"smith`, n.

1. One who works in tinned or galvanized iron, or white iron; a
tinsmith.

2. A worker in iron who finishes or polishes the work, in distinction
from one who forges it.

WHITESTER
White"ster, n. Etym: [White + -ster.]

Defn: A bleacher of lines; a whitener; a whitster. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITETAIL
White"tail`, n.

1. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The Virginia deer.

2. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The wheatear. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITETHORN
White"thorn`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: The hawthorn.

WHITETHROAT
White"throat`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of several species of Old World warblers, esp. the
common European species (Sylvia cinerea), called also strawsmear,
nettlebird, muff, and whitecap, the garden whitethroat, or golden
warbler (S. hortensis), and the lesser whitethroat (S. curruca).

WHITETOP
White"top`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: Fiorin.

WHITEWALL
White"wall`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The spotted flycatcher; -- so called from the white color of
the under parts. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITEWASH
White"wash` (, n.

1. Any wash or liquid composition for whitening something, as a wash
for making the skin fair. Addison.

2. A composition of line and water, or of whiting size, and water, or
the like, used for whitening walls, ceilings, etc.; milk of lime.

WHITEWASH
White"wash`, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Whitewashed; p. pr. & vb. n.
Whitewashing.]

1. To apply a white liquid composition to; to whiten with whitewash.

2. To make white; to give a fair external appearance to; to clear
from imputations or disgrace; hence, to clear (a bankrupt) from
obligation to pay debts.

WHITEWASHER
White"wash`er, n.

Defn: One who whitewashes.

WHITE-WATER
White"-wa`ter, n. (Far.)

Defn: A dangerous disease of sheep.

WHITEWEED
White"weed`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: A perennial composite herb (Chrysanthemum Leucanthemum) with
conspicuous white rays and a yellow disk, a common weed in grass
lands and pastures; -- called also oxeye daisy.

WHITEWING
White"wing`, n. (Zoöl.)
(a) The chaffinch; -- so called from the white bands on the wing.
(b) The velvet duck.

WHITEWOOD
White"wood`, n.

Defn: The soft and easily-worked wood of the tulip tree
(Liriodendron). It is much used in cabinetwork, carriage building,
etc.

Note: Several other kinds of light-colored wood are called whitewood
in various countries, as the wood of Bignonia leucoxylon in the West
Indies, of Pittosporum bicolor in Tasmania, etc. Whitewood bark. See
the Note under Canella.

WHITEWORT
White"wort`, n. (Bot.)
(a) Wild camomile.
(b) A kind of Solomon's seal (Polygonum officinale).

WHITFLAW
Whit"flaw`, n. Etym: [See Whitlow.]

Defn: Whitlow. [Obs.] "The nails fallen off by whitflaws." Herrick.

WHITHER
Whith"er, adv. Etym: [OE. whider. AS. hwider; akin to E. where, who;
cf. Goth. hvadre whither. See Who, and cf. Hither, Thither.]

1. To what place; -- used interrogatively; as, whither goest thou
"Whider may I flee" Chaucer.
Sir Valentine, whither away so fast Shak.

2. To what or which place; -- used relatively.
That no man should know . . . whither that he went. Chaucer.
We came unto the land whither thou sentest us. Num. xiii. 27.

3. To what point, degree, end, conclusion, or design; whereunto;
whereto; -- used in a sense not physical.
Nor have I . . . whither to appeal. Milton.
Any whither, to any place; anywhere. [Obs.] "Any whither, in hope of
life eternal." Jer. Taylor.
 -- No whither, to no place; nowhere. [Obs.] 2 Kings v. 25.

Syn.
 -- Where.
 -- Whither, Where. Whither properly implies motion to place, and
where rest in a place. Whither is now, however, to a great extent,
obsolete, except in poetry, or in compositions of a grave and serious
character and in language where precision is required. Where has
taken its place, as in the question, "Where are you going"

WHITHERSOEVER
Whith`er*so*ev"er, adv. Etym: [Whither + soever.]

Defn: To whatever place; to what place soever; wheresoever; as, I
will go whithersoever you lead.

WHITHERWARD
Whith"er*ward, adv.

Defn: In what direction; toward what or which place. R. of Brunne.
Whitherward to turn for a good course of life was by no means too
apparent. Carlyle.

WHITILE
Whit"ile, n. Etym: [Perhaps properly, the cutter (see Whittle, v.),
or cf. whitewall, witwal.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: The yaffle. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITING
Whit"ing, n. Etym: [From White.]

1. (Zoöl.)
(a) A common European food fish (Melangus vulgaris) of the Codfish
family; -- called also fittin.
(b) A North American fish (Merlucius vulgaris) allied to the
preceding; -- called also silver hake.
(c) Any one of several species of North American marine sciænoid food
fishes belonging to genus Menticirrhus, especially M. Americanus,
found from Maryland to Brazil, and M. littoralis, common from
Virginia to Texas; -- called also silver whiting, and surf whiting.

Note: Various other fishes are locally called whiting, as the
kingfish (a), the sailor's choice (b), the Pacific tomcod, and
certain species of lake whitefishes.

2. Chalk prepared in an impalpable powder by pulverizing and repeated
washing, used as a pigment, as an ingredient in putty, for cleaning
silver, etc. Whiting pollack. (Zoöl.) Same as Pollack.
 -- Whiting pout (Zoöl.), the bib, 2.

WHITING-MOP
Whit"ing-mop`, n. [Obs.]

1. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A young whiting. [Prov. Eng.]

2. A fair lass. "This pretty whiting-mop." Massinger.

WHITISH
Whit"ish, a. Etym: [From White.]

1. Somewhat white; approaching white; white in a moderate degree.

2. (Bot.)

Defn: Covered with an opaque white powder.

WHITISHNESS
Whit"ish*ness, n.

Defn: The quality or state of being whitish or somewhat white.

WHITLEATHER
Whit"leath`er, n. Etym: [White + leather.]

1. Leather dressed or tawed with alum, salt, etc., remarkable for its
pliability and toughness; white leather.

2. (Anat.)

Defn: The paxwax. See Paxwax.

WHITLING
Whit"ling, n. Etym: [White + -ling.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: A young full trout during its second season. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITLOW
Whit"low, n. Etym: [Prov. E. whickflaw, for quickflaw, i. e., a flaw
or sore at the quick; cf. Icel. kvika the quick under the nail or
under a horse's hoof. See Quick, a., and Flaw.]

1. (Med.)

Defn: An inflammation of the fingers or toes, generally of the last
phalanx, terminating usually in suppuration. The inflammation may
occupy any seat between the skin and the bone, but is usually applied
to a felon or inflammation of the periosteal structures of the bone.

2. (Far.)

Defn: An inflammatory disease of the feet. It occurs round the hoof,
where an acrid matter is collected. Whitlow grass (Bot.), name given
to several inconspicuous herbs, which were thought to be a cure for
the whitlow, as Saxifraga tridactylites, Draba verna, and several
species of Paronychia.

WHITLOW-WORT
Whit"low-wort`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: Same as Whitlow grass, under Whitlow.

WHITMONDAY
Whit"mon`day, n. (Eccl.)

Defn: The day following Whitsunday; -- called also Whitsun Monday.

WHITNEYITE
Whit"ney*ite, n. Etym: [So called after J.D. Whitney, an American
geologist.] (Min.)

Defn: an arsenide of copper from Lake Superior.

WHITSON
Whit"son, a.

Defn: See Whitsun. [Obs.]

WHITSOUR
Whit"sour`, n. Etym: [White + sour.] (Bot.)

Defn: A sort of apple.

WHITSTER
Whit"ster, n. Etym: [Contracted fr. whitester.]

Defn: A whitener; a bleacher; a whitester. [Obs.]
The whitsters in Datchet mead. Shak.

WHITSUN
Whit"sun, a.

Defn: Of, pertaining to, or observed at, Whitsuntide; as, Whitsun
week; Whitsun Tuesday; Whitsun pastorals.

WHITSUNDAY
Whit"sun*day, n. Etym: [White + Sunday.]

1. (Eccl.)

Defn: The seventh Sunday, and the fiftieth day, after Easter; a
festival of the church in commemoration of the descent of the Holy
Spirit on the day of Pentecost; Pentecost; -- so called, it is said,
because, in the primitive church, those who had been newly baptized
appeared at church between Easter and Pentecost in white garments.

2. (Scots Law)

Defn: See the Note under Term, n., 12.

WHITSUNTIDE
Whit"sun*tide`, n. Etym: [Whitsunday + tide.]

Defn: The week commencing with Whitsunday, esp. the first three days
-- Whitsunday, Whitsun Monday, and Whitsun Tuesday; the time of
Pentecost. R. of Gloucester.

WHITTEN TREE
Whit"ten tree`. Etym: [Probably from white; cf. AS. hwitingtreów.]
(Bot.)

Defn: Either of two shrubs (Viburnum Lantana, and V. Opulus), so
called on account of their whitish branches.

WHITTERICK
Whit"ter*ick, n.

Defn: The curlew. [Prov. Eng.]

WHITTLE
Whit"tle, n. Etym: [AS. hwitel, from hwit white; akin to Icel.
hvitill a white bed cover. See White.]
(a) A grayish, coarse double blanket worn by countrywomen, in the
west of England, over the shoulders, like a cloak or shawl. C.
Kingsley.
(b) Same as Whittle shawl, below. Whittle shawl, a kind of fine
woolen shawl, originally and especially a white one.

WHITTLE
Whit"tle, n. Etym: [OE. thwitel, fr. AS. pwitan to cut. Cf. Thwittle,
Thwaite a piece of ground.]

Defn: A knife; esp., a pocket, sheath, or clasp knife. "A butcher's
whittle." Dryden. "Rude whittles." Macaulay.
He wore a Sheffield whittle in his hose. Betterton.

WHITTLE
Whit"tle, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Whittled; p. pr. & vb. n. Whittling.]

1. To pare or cut off the surface of with a small knife; to cut or
shape, as a piece of wood held in the hand, with a clasp knife or
pocketknife.

2. To edge; to sharpen; to render eager or excited; esp., to excite
with liquor; to inebriate. [Obs.]
"In vino veritas." When men are well whittled, their tongues run at
random. Withals.

WHITTLE
Whit"tle, v. i.

Defn: To cut or shape a piece of wood with am small knife; to cut up
a piece of wood with a knife.
Dexterity with a pocketknife is a part of a Nantucket education; but
I am inclined to think the propensity is national. Americans must and
will whittle. Willis.

WHITTLINGS
Whit"tlings, n. pl.

Defn: Chips made by one who whittles; shavings cut from a stick with
a knife.

WHITTRET
Whit"tret, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A weasel. [Scot.]

WHITTUESDAY
Whit"tues`day, n. (Eccl.)

Defn: The day following Whitmonday; -- called also Whitsun Tuesday.

WHITWALL
Whit"wall`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Same as Whetile.

WHITWORTH BALL
Whit"worth ball`. (Gun.)

Defn: A prejectile used in the Whitworth gun.

WHITWORTH GUN
Whit"worth gun`. (Gun.)

Defn: A form of rifled cannon and small arms invented by Sir Joseph
Whitworth, of Manchester, England.

Note: In Mr. Whitworth's system, the bore of the gun has a polygonal
section, and the twist is rapid. The ball, which is pointed in front,
is made to fit the bore accurately, and is very much elongated, its
length being about three and one half times as great as its diameter.
H. L. Scott.

WHITY-BROWN
Whit"y-brown`, a.

Defn: Of a color between white and brown. Pegge.

WHIZ
Whiz, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whizzed; p. pr. & vb. n. Whizzing.] Etym:
[Of imitative origin. Whistle, and Hiss.]

Defn: To make a humming or hissing sound, like an arrow or ball
flying through the air; to fly or move swiftly with a sharp hissing
or whistling sound. [Written also whizz.]
It flew, and whizzing, cut the liquid way. Dryden.

WHIZ
Whiz, n.

Defn: A hissing and humming sound.
Like the whiz of my crossbow. Coleridge.

WHIZZINGLY
Whiz"zing*ly, adv.

Defn: With a whizzing sound.

WHO
Who, pron. [Possess. whose; object. Whom.] Etym: [OE. who, wha, AS.
hwa, interrogative pron., neut. hwæt; akin to OFries. hwa, neut.
hwet, OS. hwe, neut. hwat, D. wie, neut. wat, G. wer, neut.was, OHG.
wer, hwer, neut. waz, hwaz, Icel. hvat, neut., Dan. hvo, neut. hvad,
Sw. ho, hvem, neut. hvad, Goth. hwas, fem. hwo, neut. hwa, Lith. kas,
Ir. & Gael. co, W. pwy, L. quod, neuter of qui, Gr. po`teros whether,
Skr. kas. sq. root182. Cf. How, Quantity, Quorum, Quote, Ubiquity,
What, When, Where, Whether, Which, Whither, Whom, Why.]

1. Originally, an interrogative pronoun, later, a relative pronoun
also; -- used always substantively, and either as singular or plural.
See the Note under What, pron., 1. As interrogative pronouns, who and
whom ask the question: What or which person or persons Who and whom,
as relative pronouns (in the sense of that), are properly used of
persons (corresponding to which, as applied to things), but are
sometimes, less properly and now rarely, used of animals, plants,
etc. Who and whom, as compound relatives, are also used especially of
persons, meaning the person that; the persons that; the one that;
whosoever. "Let who will be President." Macaulay.
[He] should not tell whose children they were. Chaucer.
There thou tell'st of kings, and who aspire; Who fall, who rise, who
triumph, who do moan. Daniel.
Adders who with cloven tongues Do hiss into madness. Shak.
Whom I could pity thus forlorn. Milton.
How hard is our fate, who serve in the state. Addison.
Who cheapens life, abates the fear of death. Young.
The brace of large greyhounds, who were the companions of his sports.
Sir W. Scott.

2. One; any; one. [Obs., except in the archaic phrase, as who should
say.]
As who should say, it were a very dangerous matter if a man in any
point should be found wiser than his forefathers were. Robynson
(More's Utopia).

WHOA
Whoa, interj.

Defn: Stop; stand; hold. See Ho, 2.

WHOBUB
Who"bub, n.

Defn: Hubbub. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl.

WHOEVER
Who*ev"er, pron.

Defn: Whatever person; any person who; be or she who; any one who;
as, he shall be punished, whoever he may be. "Whoever envies or
repines." Milton. "Whoever the king favors." Shak.

WHOLE
Whole, a. Etym: [OE. hole, hol, hal, hool, AS. hal well, sound,
healthy; akin to OFries. & OS. h, D. heel, G. heil, Icel. heill, Sw.
hel whole, Dan. heel, Goth. hails well, sound, OIr. c augury. Cf.
Hale, Hail to greet, Heal to cure, Health, Holy.]

1. Containing the total amount, number, etc.; comprising all the
parts; free from deficiency; all; total; entire; as, the whole earth;
the whole solar system; the whole army; the whole nation. "On their
whole host I flew unarmed." Milton.
The whole race of mankind. Shak.

2. Complete; entire; not defective or imperfect; not broken or
fractured; unimpaired; uninjured; integral; as, a whole orange; the
egg is whole; the vessel is whole.
My life is yet whole in me. 2 Sam. i. 9.

3. Possessing, or being in a state of, heath and soundness; healthy;
sound; well.
[She] findeth there her friends hole and sound. Chaucer.
They that be whole need not a physician. Matt. ix. 12.
When Sir Lancelot's deadly hurt was whole. Tennyson.
Whole blood. (Law of Descent) See under Blood, n., 2.
 -- Whole note (Mus.), the note which represents a note of longest
duration in common use; a semibreve.
 -- Whole number (Math.), a number which is not a fraction or mixed
number; an integer. Whole snipe (Zoöl.), the common snipe, as
distinguished from the smaller jacksnipe. [Prov. Eng.]

Syn.
 -- All; total; complete; entire; integral; undivided; uninjured;
unimpaired; unbroken; healthy.
 -- Whole, Total, Entire, Complete. When we use the word whole, we
refer to a thing as made up of parts, none of which are wanting; as,
a whole week; a whole year; the whole creation. When we use the word
total, we have reference to all as taken together, and forming a
single totality; as, the total amount; the total income. When we
speak of a thing as entire, we have no reference to parts at all, but
regard the thing as an integer, i. e., continuous or unbroken; as, an
entire year; entire prosperity. When we speak of a thing as complete,
there is reference to some progress which results in a filling out to
some end or object, or a perfected state with no deficiency; as,
complete success; a complete victory.
All the whole army stood agazed on him. Shak.
One entire and perfect chrysolite. Shak.
Lest total darkness should by night regain Her old possession, and
extinguish life. Milton.
So absolute she seems, And in herself complete. Milton.

WHOLE
Whole, n.

1. The entire thing; the entire assemblage of parts; totality; all of
a thing, without defect or exception; a thing complete in itself.
"This not the whole of life to live, Nor all of death to die. J.
Montgomery.

2. A regular combination of parts; a system.
Parts answering parts shall slide into a whole. Pope.
Committee of the whole. See under Committee.
 -- Upon the whole, considering all things; taking everything into
account; in view of all the circumstances or conditions.

Syn.
 -- Totality; total; amount; aggregate; gross.

WHOLE-HOOFED
Whole"-hoofed`, a.

Defn: Having an undivided hoof, as the horse.

WHOLE-LENGTH
Whole"-length`, a.

Defn: Representing the whole figure; -- said of a picture or statue.
 -- n.

Defn: A portrait or statue representing the whole figure.

WHOLENESS
Whole"ness, n.

Defn: The quality or state of being whole, entire, or sound;
entireness; totality; completeness.

WHOLESALE
Whole"sale`, n.

Defn: Sale of goods by the piece or large quantity, as distinguished
from retail. By wholesale, in the mass; in large quantities; without
distinction or discrimination.
Some, from vanity or envy, despise a valuable book, and throw
contempt upon it by wholesale. I. Watts.

WHOLESALE
Whole"sale`, a.

1. Pertaining to, or engaged in, trade by the piece or large
quantity; selling to retailers or jobbers rather than to consumers;
as, a wholesale merchant; the wholesale price.

2. Extensive and indiscriminate; as, wholesale slaughter. "A time for
wholesale trust." Mrs. Humphry Ward.

WHOLESOME
Whole"some, a. [Compar. Wholesomer; superl. Wholesomest.] Etym:
[Whole + some; cf. Icel. heilsamr, G. heilsam, D. heilzaam.]

1. Tending to promote health; favoring health; salubrious; salutary.
Wholesome thirst and appetite. Milton.
From which the industrious poor derive an agreeable and wholesome
variety of food. A Smith.

2. Contributing to the health of the mind; favorable to morals,
religion, or prosperity; conducive to good; salutary; sound; as,
wholesome advice; wholesome doctrines; wholesome truths; wholesome
laws.
A wholesome tongue is a tree of life. Prov. xv. 4.
I can not . . . make you a wholesome answer; my wit's diseased. Shak.
A wholesome suspicion began to be entertained. Sir W. Scott.

3. Sound; healthy. [Obs.] Shak.
 -- Whole"some*ly, adv.
 -- Whole"some*ness, n.

WHOLE-SOULED
Whole"-souled`, a.

Defn: Thoroughly imbued with a right spirit; noble-minded; devoted.

WHOLLY
Whol"ly, adv.

1. In a whole or complete manner; entirely; completely; perfectly.
Nor wholly overcome, nor wholly yield. Dryden.

2. To the exclusion of other things; totally; fully.
They employed themselves wholly in domestic life. Addison.

WHOM
Whom, pron. Etym: [OE. wham, AS. dative hwam, hw. See Who.]

Defn: The objective case of who. See Who.

Note: In Old English, whom was also commonly used as a dative. Cf.
Him.
And every grass that groweth upon root She shall eke know, and whom
it will do boot. Chaucer.

WHOMSOEVER
Whom`so*ev"er, pron.

Defn: The objective of whosoever. See Whosoever.
The Most High ruleth in the kingdow of men, and giveth it to
whomsoever he will. Dan. iv. 17.

WHOOBUB
Whoo"bub, n.

Defn: Hubbub. [Obs.] Shak.

WHOOP
Whoop (, n. Etym: [See Hoopoe.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: The hoopoe.

WHOOP
Whoop, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whooped; p. pr. & vb. n. Whooping.] Etym:
[OE. houpen. See Hoop, v. i.]

1. To utter a whoop, or loud cry, as eagerness, enthusiasm, or
enjoyment; to cry out; to shout; to halloo; to utter a war whoop; to
hoot, as an owl.
Each whooping with a merry shout. Wordsworth.
When naught was heard but now and then the howl Of some vile cur, or
whooping of the owl. W. Browne.

2. To cough or breathe with a sonorous inspiration, as in whooping
cough.

WHOOP
Whoop, v. t.

Defn: To insult with shouts; to chase with derision.
And suffered me by the voice of slaves to be Whooped out of Rome.
Shak.

WHOOP
Whoop, n.

1. A shout of pursuit or of war; a very of eagerness, enthusiasm,
enjoyment, vengeance, terror, or the like; an halloo; a hoot, or cry,
as of an owl.
A fox, crossing the road, drew off a considerable detachment, who
clapped spurs to their horses, and pursued him with whoops and
halloos. Addison.
The whoop of the crane. Longfellow.

2. A loud, shrill, prolonged sound or sonorous inspiration, as in
whooping cough.

WHOOPER
Whoop"er, n.

Defn: One who, or that which, whooops. Woopher swan. (Zoöl.) See the
Note under Swan.

WHOOPING
Whoop"ing,

Defn: a. & n. from Whoop, v. t. Whooping cough (Med.), a violent,
convulsive cough, returning at longer or shorter intervals, and
consisting of several expirations, followed by a sonorous
inspiration, or whoop; chin cough; hooping cough. Dunglison.
 -- Whooping crane (Zoöl.), a North American crane (Crus Americana)
noted for the loud, whooplike note which it utters.
 -- Whooping swan (Zoöl.), the whooper swan. See the Note under Swan.

WHOOT
Whoot, v. i. Etym: [See Hoot.]

Defn: To hoot. [Obs.]

WHOP
Whop, v. t.

Defn: Same as Whap. Forby.

WHOP
Whop, n.

Defn: Same as Whap.

WHOPPER
Whop"per, n. Etym: [Cf. Whapper.]

1. One who, or that which, whops.

2. Same as Whapper.

WHORE
Whore, n. Etym: [OE. hore, AS. h; akin to D. hoer, hoere, G. hure,
OHG. huora, huorra, Icel. h, Dan. hore, Sw. hora, Goth. h an
adulterer, AS. h adultery, OHG. huor, and probably to L. carus dear.
Cf. Charity.]

Defn: A woman who practices unlawful sexual commerce with men,
especially one who prostitutes her body for hire; a prostitute; a
harlot. Wyclif.

Syn.
 -- Harlot; courtesan; prostitute; strumpet.

WHORE
Whore, v. i. [imp. & p. p. Whored; p. pr. & vb. n. Whoring.] Etym:
[Cf. Icel. h. See Whore, n.]

1. To have unlawful sexual intercourse; to practice lewdness.

2. (Script.)

Defn: To worship false and impure gods.

WHORE
Whore, v. t.

Defn: To corrupt by lewd intercourse; to make a whore of; to debauch.
[R.] Congreve.

WHOREDOM
Whore"dom, n. Etym: [OE. hordom; cf. Icel. h.]

1. The practice of unlawful intercourse with the other sex;
fornication; lewdness.

2. (Script.)

Defn: The sin of worshiping idols; idolatry.
O Ephraim, thou committest whoredom, and Israel is defiled; they will
not . . . turn unto their God. Hos. v. 3, 4.

WHOREMASTER
Whore"mas`ter, n.

1. A man who practices lewdness; a lecher; a whoremonger.

2. One keeps or procures whores for others; a pimp; a procurer.

WHOREMASTERLY
Whore"mas`ter*ly, a.

Defn: Having the character of a whoremaster; lecherous; libidinous.

WHOREMONGER
Whore"mon`ger, n.

Defn: A whoremaster; a lecher; a man who frequents the society of
whores.

WHORESON
Whore"son, n.

Defn: A bastard; colloquially, a low, scurvy fellow; -- used
generally in contempt, or in coarse humor. Also used adjectively.
[Archaic] Shak.

WHORISH
Whor"ish, a.

Defn: Resembling a whore in character or conduct; addicted to
unlawful pleasures; incontinent; lewd; unchaste.
 -- Whor"ish*ly, adv.
 -- Whor"ish*ness, n.

WHORL
Whorl, n. Etym: [OE. whorvil the whirl of a spindle; akin to AS.
hweorfa the whirl of a spindle, hweorfan to turn; cf. OD. worvel the
whirl of a spindle. See Whirl, n. & v.]

1. (Bot.)

Defn: A circle of two or more leaves, flowers, or other organs, about
the same part or joint of a stem.

2. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A volution, or turn, of the spire of a univalve shell.

3. (Spinning)

Defn: The fly of a spindle.

WHORLED
Whorled, a.

Defn: Furnished with whorls; arranged in the form of a whorl or
whorls; verticillate; as, whorled leaves.

WHORLER
Whorl"er, n.

Defn: A potter's wheel.

WHORT
Whort, n. Etym: [See Whortleberry.] (Bot.)

Defn: The whortleberry, or bilberry. See Whortleberry (a).

WHORTLE
Whor"tle, n. (Bot.)

Defn: The whortleberry, or bilberry.
[He] looked ahead of him from behind a tump of whortles. R. D.
Blackmore.

WHORTLEBERRY
Whor"tle*ber`ry, n. Etym: [AS. wyrtil a small shrub (dim. of wyrt
wort) + E. berry. See Wort, and cf. Huckleberry, Hurtleberry.] (Bot.)
(a) In England, the fruit of Vaccinium Myrtillus; also, the plant
itself. See Bilberry, 1.
(b) The fruit of several shrubby plants of the genus Gaylussacia;
also, any one of these plants. See Huckleberry.

WHOSE
Whose, pron. Etym: [OE. whos, whas, AS. hwæs, gen. of hwa. See Who.]

Defn: The possessive case of who or which. See Who, and Which.
Whose daughter art thou tell me, I pray thee. Gen. xxiv. 23.
The question whose solution I require. Dryden.

WHOSESOEVER
Whose`so*ev"er, pron.

Defn: The possessive of whosoever. See Whosoever.

WHOSO
Who"so, pron.

Defn: Whosoever. Piers Plowman.
Whoso shrinks or falters now, . . . Brand the craven on his brow!
Whittier.

WHOSOEVER
Who`so*ev"er, pron.

Defn: Whatsoever person; any person whatever that; whoever.
Whosoever will, let him take . . . freely. Rev. xxii. 17.

WHOT
Whot, a.

Defn: Hot. [Obs.] Spenser.

WHUR
Whur, v. i. Etym: [Probably of imitative origin. Cf. Hurr, Hurry,
Whir.]

1. To make a rough, humming sound, like one who pronounces the letter
r with too much force; to whir; to birr.

2. To snarl or growl, as a dog. Halliwell.

WHUR
Whur, n.

Defn: A humming or whirring sound, like that of a body moving through
the air with velocity; a whir.

WHURRY
Whur"ry, v. t. Etym: [See Hurry.]

Defn: To whisk along quickly; to hurry. [R.]
Whurrying the chariot with them to the shore. Vicars.

WHURT
Whurt, n. (Bot.)

Defn: See Whort.

WHY
Why, adv. Etym: [OE. whi, why, AS. hwi, hw, instrumental case of hwa,
hwæt; akin to Icel. hvi why, Dan. & Sw. hvi; cf. Goth. hw. Who.]

1. For what cause, reason, or purpose; on what account; wherefore; --
used interrogatively. See the Note under What, pron., 1.
Turn ye, turn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of
Israel Ezek. xxxiii. 11.

2. For which; on account of which; -- used relatively.
No ground of enmity between us known Why he should mean me ill or
seek to harm. Milton.
Turn the discourse; I have a reason why I would not have you speak so
tenderly. Dryden.

3. The reason or cause for which; that on account of which; on what
account; as, I know not why he left town so suddenly; -- used as a
compound relative.

Note: Why is sometimes used as an interjection or an expletive in
expression of surprise or content at a turn of affairs; used also in
calling. "Why, Jessica!" Shak.
If her chill heart I can not move, Why, I'll enjoy the very love.
Cowley.
Sometimes, also, it is used as a noun.
The how and the why and the where. Goldsmith.
For why, because; why. See Forwhy. [Obs. or Colloq.]

WHY
Why, n.

Defn: A young heifer. [Prov. Eng.] Grose.

WHYDAH BIRD; WHYDAH FINCH
Whyd"ah bird`, or Whyd"ah finch`. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The whidah bird.

WHY-NOT
Why"-not`, n.

Defn: A violent and peremptory procedure without any assigned reason;
a sudden conclusive happening. [Obs.]
When the church Was taken with a why-not in the lurch. Hudibras.
This game . . . was like to have been lost with a why-not. Nugæ
Antiq.

WICH
Wich, n.

Defn: A variant of 1st Wick.

WICHITAS
Wich"i*tas, n. pl.; sing. Wichita (. (Ethnol.)

Defn: A tribe of Indians native of the region between the Arkansas
and Red rivers. They are related to the Pawnees. See Pawnees.

WICK; WICH
Wick, or Wich, n. Etym: [AS. wic village, fr. L. vicus. In some names
of places, perhaps fr. Icel. vik an inlet, creek, bay. See Vicinity,
and cf. Villa.]

1. A street; a village; a castle; a dwelling; a place of work, or
exercise of authority; -- now obsolete except in composition; as,
bailiwick, Warwick, Greenwick. Stow.

2. (Curling)

Defn: A narrow port or passage in the rink or course, flanked by the
stones of previous players.

WICK
Wick, n. Etym: [OE. wicke, weyke, weke, AS. weoca or wecca; cf. D.
wiek a roll of lint, Prov. G. wicke, and wieche, OHG. wiohha, Sw.
veke, Dan. væge; of uncertain origin.]

Defn: A bundle of fibers, or a loosely twisted or braided cord, tape,
or tube, usually made of soft spun cotton threads, which by capillary
attraction draws up a steady supply of the oil in lamps, the melted
tallow or wax in candles, or other material used for illumination, in
small successive portions, to be burned.
But true it is, that when the oil is spent The light goes out, and
wick is thrown away. Spenser.

WICK
Wick, v. i. (Curling)

Defn: To strike a stone in an oblique direction. Jamieson.

WICKE
Wick"e, a.

Defn: Wicked. [Obs.] Piers Plowman. "With full wikke intent."
Chaucer.

WICKED
Wicked, a.

Defn: Having a wick; -- used chiefly in composition; as, a two-wicked
lamp.

WICKED
Wick"ed a. Etym: [OE. wicked, fr. wicke wicked; probably originally
the same word as wicche wizard, witch. See Witch.]

1. Evil in principle or practice; deviating from morality; contrary
to the moral or divine law; addicted to vice or sin; sinful; immoral;
profligate; -- said of persons and things; as, a wicked king; a
wicked woman; a wicked deed; wicked designs.
Hence, then, and evil go with thee along, Thy offspring, to the place
of evil, hell, Thou and thy wicked crew! Milton.
Never, never, wicked man was wise. Pope.

2. Cursed; baneful; hurtful; bad; pernicious; dangerous. [Obs.]
"Wicked dew." Shak.
This were a wicked way, but whoso had a guide. P. Plowman.

3. Ludicrously or sportively mischievous; disposed to mischief;
roguish. [Colloq.]
Pen looked uncommonly wicked. Thackeray.

Syn.
 -- Iniquitous; sinful; criminal; guilty; immoral; unjust;
unrighteous; unholy; irreligious; ungodly; profane; vicious;
pernicious; atrocious; nefarious; heinous; flagrant; flagitious;
abandoned. See Iniquitous.

WICKEDLY
Wick"ed*ly, adv.

Defn: In a wicked manner; in a manner, or with motives and designs,
contrary to the divine law or the law of morality; viciously;
corruptly; immorally.
I have sinned, and I have done wickedly. 2 Sam. xxiv. 17.

WICKEDNESS
Wick"ed*ness, n.

1. The quality or state of being wicked; departure from the rules of
the divine or the moral law; evil disposition or practices;
immorality; depravity; sinfulness.
God saw that the wickedness of man was great. Gen. vi. 5.
Their inward part is very wickedness. Ps. v. 9.

2. A wicked thing or act; crime; sin; iniquity.
I'll never care what wickedness I do, If this man comes to good.
Shak.

WICKEN TREE
Wick"en tree`.

Defn: Same as Quicken tree.

WICKER
Wick"er, n. Etym: [OE. wiker, wikir, osier, probably akin to AS.
wican to give way. Cf. Weak.]

1. A small pliant twig or osier; a rod for making basketwork and the
like; a withe.

2. Wickerwork; a piece of wickerwork, esp. a basket.
Then quick did dress His half milk up for cheese, and in a press Of
wicker pressed it. Chapman.

3. Same as 1st Wike. [Prov. Eng.]

WICKER
Wick"er, a.

Defn: Made of, or covered with, twigs or osiers, or wickerwork.
Each one a little wicker basket had, Made of fine twigs, entrailéd
curiously. Spenser.

WICKERED
Wick"ered, a.

Defn: Made of, secured by, or covered with, wickers or wickerwork.
Ships of light timber, wickered with osier between, and covered over
with leather. Milton.

WICKERWORK
Wick"er*work`, n.

Defn: A texture of osiers, twigs, or rods; articles made of such a
texture.

WICKET
Wick"et, n. Etym: [OE. wiket, OF. wiket, guichet, F. quichet;
probably of Scand. origin; cf. Icel. v a small creek, inlet, bay, vik
a corner.]

1. A small gate or door, especially one forming part of, or placed
near, a larger door or gate; a narrow opening or entrance cut in or
beside a door or gate, or the door which is used to close such
entrance or aperture. Piers Plowman. "Heaven's wicket." Milton.
And so went to the high street, . . . and came to the great tower,
but the gate and wicket was fast closed. Ld. Berners.
The wicket, often opened, knew the key. Dryden.

2. A small gate by which the chamber of canal locks is emptied, or by
which the amount of water passing to a water wheel is regulated.

3. (Cricket)
(a) A small framework at which the ball is bowled. It consists of
three rods, or stumps, set vertically in the ground, with one or two
short rods, called bails, lying horizontally across the top.
(b) The ground on which the wickets are set.

4. A place of shelter made of the boughs of trees, -- used by
lumbermen, etc. [Local, U. S.] Bartlett.

5. (Mining)

Defn: The space between the pillars, in postand-stall working.
Raymond. Wicket door, Wicket gate, a small door or gate; a wicket.
See def. 1, above. Bunyan.
 -- Wicket keeper (Cricket), the player who stands behind the wicket
to catch the balls and endeavor to put the batsman out.

WICKING
Wick"ing, n.

Defn: the material of which wicks are made; esp., a loosely braided
or twisted cord or tape of cotton.

WICKIUP WICKYUP
{ Wick"i*up Wick"y*up }, n.

Defn: Vars of Wikiup.

WICLIFITE; WICKLIFFITE
Wic"lif*ite, Wick"liff*ite, n.

Defn: See Wyclifite.

WICOPY
Wic"o*py, n. (Bot.)

Defn: See Leatherwood.

WIDAL'S TEST; WIDAL TEST; WIDAL'S REACTION; WIDAL REACTION
Wi*dal's", or Wi*dal", test or reaction . [After Fernand Widal (b.
1862), French physician.] (Med.)

Defn: A test for typhoid fever based on the fact that blood serum of
one affected, in a bouillon culture of typhoid bacilli, causes the
bacilli to agglutinate and lose their motility.

WIDDY
Wid"dy, n. Etym: [Cf. Withy.]

Defn: A rope or halter made of flexible twigs, or withes, as of
birch. [Scot.]

WIDE
Wide, a. [Compar. Wider; superl. Widest.] Etym: [OE. wid, wyde, AS.
wid; akin to OFries. & OS. wid, D. wijd, G. weit, OHG. wit, Icel.
vi\'ebr, Sw. & Dan. vid; of uncertain origin.]

1. Having considerable distance or extent between the sides; spacious
across; much extended in a direction at right angles to that of
length; not narrow; broad; as, wide cloth; a wide table; a wide
highway; a wide bed; a wide hall or entry.
The chambers and the stables weren wyde. Chaucer.
Wide is the gate . . . that leadeth to destruction. Matt. vii. 18.

2. Having a great extent every way; extended; spacious; broad; vast;
extensive; as, a wide plain; the wide ocean; a wide difference. "This
wyde world." Chaucer.
For sceptered cynics earth were far too wide a den. Byron.
When the wide bloom, on earth that lies, Seems of a brighter world
than ours. Bryant.

3. Of large scope; comprehensive; liberal; broad; as, wide views; a
wide understanding.
Men of strongest head and widest culture. M. Arnold.

4. Of a certain measure between the sides; measuring in a direction
at right angles to that of length; as, a table three feet wide.

5. Remote; distant; far.
The contrary being so wide from the truth of Scripture and the
attributes of God. Hammond.

6. Far from truth, from propriety, from necessity, or the like. "Our
wide expositors." Milton.
It is far wide that the people have such judgments. Latimer.
How wide is all this long pretense ! Herbert.

7. On one side or the other of the mark; too far side-wise from the
mark, the wicket, the batsman, etc.
Surely he shoots wide on the bow hand. Spenser.
I was but two bows wide. Massinger.

8. (Phon.)

Defn: Made, as a vowel, with a less tense, and more open and relaxed,
condition of the mouth organs; -- opposed to primary as used by Mr.
Bell, and to narrow as used by Mr. Sweet. The effect, as explained by
Mr. Bell, is due to the relaxation or tension of the pharynx; as
explained by Mr. Sweet and others, it is due to the action of the
tongue. The wide of e (eve) is î (îll); of a (ate) is ê (ênd), etc.
See Guide to Pronunciation, § 13-15.

Note: Wide is often prefixed to words, esp. to participles and
participial adjectives, to form self-explaining compounds; as, wide-
beaming, wide-branched, wide-chopped, wide-echoing, wide-extended,
wide-mouthed, wide-spread, wide-spreading, and the like. Far and
wide. See under Far.
 -- Wide gauge. See the Note under Cauge, 6.

WIDE
Wide, adv. Etym: [As. w.]

1. To a distance; far; widely; to a great distance or extent; as, his
fame was spread wide.
[I] went wyde in this world, wonders to hear. Piers Plowman.

2. So as to leave or have a great space between the sides; so as to
form a large opening. Shak.

3. So as to be or strike far from, or on one side of, an object or
purpose; aside; astray.

WIDE
Wide, n.

1. That which is wide; wide space; width; extent. "The waste wide of
that abyss." Tennyson.

2. That which goes wide, or to one side of the mark.

WIDE-ANGLE
Wide"-an`gle, a. (Photog. & Optics)

Defn: Having or covering an angle wider than the ordinary; -- applied
to certain lenses of relatively short focus. Lenses for ordinary
purposes have an angle of 50º or less. Wide-angle lenses may cover as
much as 100º and are useful for photographing at short range, but the
pictures appear distorted.

WIDE-AWAKE
Wide`-a*wake", a.

Defn: Fully awake; not Dickens.

WIDE-AWAKE
Wide`-a*wake", n.

Defn: A broad-brimmed, low-crowned felt hat.

WIDEGAP
Wide"gap`, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The angler; -- called also widegab, and widegut.

WIDELY
Wide"ly, adv.

1. In a wide manner; to a wide degree or extent; far; extensively;
as, the gospel was widely disseminated by the apostles.

2. Very much; to a great degree or extent; as, to differ widely in
opinion.

WIDEN
Wid"en, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Widened; p. pr. & vb. n. Widening.]

Defn: To make wide or wider; to extend in breadth; to increase the
width of; as, to widen a field; to widen a breach; to widen a
stocking.

WIDEN
Wid"en, v. i.

Defn: To grow wide or wider; to enlarge; to spread; to extend.
Arches widen, and long aisles extend. Pope.

WIDENESS
Wide"ness, n.

1. The quality or state of being wide; breadth; width; great extent
from side to side; as, the wideness of a room. "I landed in a small
creek about the wideness of my canoe." Swift.

2. Large extent in all directions; broadness; greatness; as, the
wideness of the sea or ocean.

WIDESPREAD
Wide"spread`, a.

Defn: Spread to a great distance; widely extended; extending far and
wide; as, widespread wings; a widespread movement.

WIDEWHERE
Wide"where`, adv. Etym: [See Wide, and Where.]

Defn: Widely; far and wide. [Obs.] Chaucer.

WIDGEON
Widg"eon, n. Etym: [Probably from an old French form of F. vigeon,
vingeon, gingeon; of uncertain origin; cf. L. vipio, -onis, a kind of
small crane.] (Zoöl.)

Defn: Any one of several species of fresh-water ducks, especially
those belonging to the subgenus Mareca, of the genus Anas. The common
European widgeon (Anas penelope) and the American widgeon (A.
Americana) are the most important species. The latter is called also
baldhead, baldpate, baldface, baldcrown, smoking duck, wheat, duck,
and whitebelly. Bald-faced, or Green-headed, widgeon, the American
widgeon.
 -- Black widgeon, the European tufted duck.
 -- Gray widgeon. (a) The gadwall. (b) The pintail duck.
 -- Great headed widgeon, the poachard.
 -- Pied widgeon. (a) The poachard. (b) The goosander. Saw-billed
widgeon, the merganser.
 -- Sea widgeon. See in the Vocabulary.
 -- Spear widgeon, the goosander. [Prov. Eng.] -- Spoonbilled
widgeon, the shoveler.
 -- White widgeon, the smew.
 -- Wood widgeon, the wood duck.

WIDISH
Wid"ish, a.

Defn: Moderately wide. Tyndall.

WIDMANSTATTEN FIGURES; WIDMANSTAETTEN FIGURES
Wid"man*stät`ten fig"ures. (Min.)

Defn: Certain figures appearing on etched meteoric iron; -- so called
after A. B. Widmanstätten, of Vienna, who first described them in
1808. See the Note and Illust. under Meteorite.

WIDOW
Wid"ow, n. Etym: [OE. widewe, widwe, AS. weoduwe, widuwe, wuduwe;
akin to OFries. widwe, OS. widowa, D. weduwe, G. wittwe, witwe, OHG.
wituwa, witawa, Goth. widuw, Russ. udova, OIr. fedb, W. gweddw, L.
vidua, Skr. vidhava; and probably to Skr. vidh to be empty, to lack;
cf. Gr. Vidual.]

Defn: A woman who has lost her husband by death, and has not married
again; one living bereaved of a husband. "A poor widow." Chaucer.
Grass widow. See under Grass.
 -- Widow bewitched, a woman separated from her husband; a grass
widow. [Colloq.] Widow-in-mourning (Zoöl.), the macavahu.
 -- Widow monkey (Zoöl.), a small South American monkey (Callithrix
lugens); -- so called on account of its color, which is black except
the dull whitish arms, neck, and face, and a ring of pure white
around the face.
 -- Widow's chamber (Eng. Law), in London, the apparel and furniture
of the bedchamber of the widow of a freeman, to which she was
formerly entitled.

WIDOW
Wid"ow, a.

Defn: Widowed. "A widow woman." 1 Kings xvii. 9. "This widow lady."
Shak.

WIDOW
Wid"ow, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Widowed; p. pr. & vb. n. Widowing.]

1. To reduce to the condition of a widow; to bereave of a husband; --
rarely used except in the past participle.
Though in thus city he Hath widowed and unchilded many a one, Which
to this hour bewail the injury. Shak.

2. To deprive of one who is loved; to strip of anything beloved or
highly esteemed; to make desolate or bare; to bereave.
The widowed isle, in mourning, Dries up her tears. Dryden.
Tress of their shriveled fruits Are widowed, dreary storms o'er all
prevail. J. Philips.
Mourn, widowed queen; forgotten Sion, mourn. Heber.

3. To endow with a widow's right. [R.] Shak.

4. To become, or survive as, the widow of. [Obs.]
Let me be married to three kings in a forenoon, and widow them all.
Shak.

WIDOW BIRD
Wid"ow bird`. (Zoöl.)

Defn: See Whidan bird.

WIDOWER
Wid"ow*er, n.

Defn: A man who has lost his wife by death, and has not married
again. Shak.

WIDOWERHOOD
Wid"ow*er*hood, n.

Defn: The state of being a widower.

WIDOWHOOD
Wid"ow*hood, n.

1. The state of being a widow; the time during which a woman is
widow; also, rarely, the state of being a widower.
Johnson clung to her memory during a widowhood of more than thirty
years. Leslie Stephen.

2. Estate settled on a widow. [Obs.] "I 'll assure her of her
widowhood . . . in all my lands." Shak.

WIDOW-HUNTER
Wid"ow-hunt`er, n.

Defn: One who courts widows, seeking to marry one with a fortune.
Addison.

WIDOWLY
Wid"ow*ly, a.

Defn: Becoming or like a widow.

WIDOW-MAKER
Wid"ow-mak`er, n.

Defn: One who makes widows by destroying husbands. [R.] Shak.

WIDOW-WAIL
Wid"ow-wail`, n. (Bot.)

Defn: A low, narrowleaved evergreen shrub (Cneorum tricoccon) found
in Southern Europe.

WIDTH
Width, n. Etym: [From Wide.]

Defn: The quality of being wide; extent from side to side; breadth;
wideness; as, the width of cloth; the width of a door.

WIDUAL
Wid"u*al, a.

Defn: Of or pertaining to a widow; vidual. [Obs.] Bale.

WIDWE
Wid"we, n.

Defn: A widow. [Obs.] Chaucer.

WIELD
Wield, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Wielded; p. pr. & vb. n. Wielding.] Etym:
[OE. welden to govern, to have power over, to possess, AS. geweldan,
gewyldan, from wealdan; akin to OS. waldan, OFries. walda, G. walten,
OHG. waltan, Icel. valda, Sw. vålla to occasion, to cause, Dan.
volde, Goth. waldan to govern, rule, L. valere to be strong. Cf.
Herald, Valiant.]

1. To govern; to rule; to keep, or have in charge; also, to possess.
[Obs.]
When a strong armed man keepeth his house, all things that he
wieldeth ben in peace. Wyclif (Luke xi. 21).
Wile [ne will] ye wield gold neither silver ne money in your girdles.
Wyclif (Matt. x. 9.)

2. To direct or regulate by influence or authority; to manage; to
control; to sway.
The famous orators . . . whose resistless eloquence Wielded at will
that fierce democraty. Milton.
Her newborn power was wielded from the first by unprincipled and
ambitions men. De Quincey.

3. To use with full command or power, as a thing not too heavy for
the holder; to manage; to handle; hence, to use or employ; as, to
wield a sword; to wield the scepter.
Base Hungarian wight! wilt thou the spigot wield! Shak.
Part wield their arms, part curb the foaming steed. Milton.
Nothing but the influence of a civilized power could induce a savage
to wield a spade. S. S. Smith.
To wield the scepter, to govern with supreme command.

WIELDABLE
Wield"a*ble, a.

Defn: Capable of being wielded.

WIELDANCE
Wield"ance, n.

Defn: The act or power of wielding. [Obs.] "Our weak wieldance." Bp.
Hall.

WIELDER
Wield"er, n.

Defn: One who wields or employs; a manager; a controller.
A wielder of the great arm of the war. Milton.

WIELDING
Wield"ing, n.

Defn: Power; authority; rule. [Obs.]
To have them in your might and in your wielding. Chaucer.

WIELDLESS
Wield"less, a.

Defn: Not to be wielded; unmanageable; unwieldy. [R.] "Wieldless
might." Spenser.

WIELDSOME
Wield"some, a.

Defn: Admitting of being easily wielded or managed. [Obs.] Golding.

WIELDY
Wield"y, a.

Defn: Capable of being wielded; manageable; wieldable; -- opposed to
unwieldy. [R.] Johnson.

WIENER SCHNITZEL
Wie"ner Schnit"zel. [G., Vienna cutlet.]

Defn: A veal cutlet variously seasoned garnished, often with lemon,
sardines, and capers.

WIER
Wier, n.

Defn: Same as Weir.

WIERANGLE
Wier`an"gle, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: Same as Wariangle. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.]

WIERY
Wier"y, a. Etym: [Cf. Wearish.]

Defn: Wet; moist; marshy. [Obs.]

WIERY
Wi"er*y, a. Etym: [From Wire; cf. Fiery.]

Defn: Wiry. [Obs.] "Wiery gold." Peacham.

WIFE
Wife, n.; pl; Wives. Etym: [OE. wif, AS. wif; akin to OFries. & OS.
wif, D. wijf, G. weib, OHG. wib, Icel. vif, Dan. viv; and perhaps to
Skr. vip excited, agitated, inspired, vip to tremble, L. vibrare to
vibrate, E. vibrate. Cf. Tacitus, [" Germania" 8]: Inesse quin etiam
sanctum aliquid et providum putant, nec aut consilia earum
aspernantur aut responsa neglegunt. Cf. Hussy a jade, Woman.]

1. A woman; an adult female; -- now used in literature only in
certain compounds and phrases, as alewife, fishwife, goodwife, and
the like. " Both men and wives." Piers Plowman.
On the green he saw sitting a wife. Chaucer.

2. The lawful consort of a man; a woman who is united to a man in
wedlock; a woman who has a husband; a married woman; -- correlative
of husband. " The husband of one wife." 1 Tin. iii. 2.
Let every one you . . . so love his wife even as himself, and the
wife see that she reverence her husband. Eph. v. 33.
To give to wife, To take to wife, to give or take (a woman) in
marriage.
 -- Wife's equity (Law), the equitable right or claim of a married
woman to a reasonable and adequate provision, by way of settlement or
otherwise, out of her choses in action, or out of any property of
hers which is under the jurisdiction of the Court of Chancery, for
the support of herself and her children. Burrill.

WIFEHOOD
Wife"hood, n. Etym: [AS. wifhad.]

1. Womanhood. [Obs.] Chaucer.

2. The state of being a wife; the character of a wife.

WIFELESS
Wife"less, a.

Defn: Without a wife; unmarried. Chaucer.

WIFELIKE
Wife"like`, a.

Defn: Of, pertaining to, or like, a wife or a woman. " Wifelike
government." Shak.

WIFELY
Wife"ly, a. Etym: [AS. wiflic.]

Defn: Becoming or life; of or pertaining to a wife. "Wifely
patience." Chaucer.
With all the tenderness of wifely love. Dryden.

WIG
Wig, n. Etym: [Abbreviation from periwig.]

1. A covering for the head, consisting of hair interwoven or united
by a kind of network, either in imitation of the natural growth, or
in abundant and flowing curls, worn to supply a deficiency of natural
hair, or for ornament, or according to traditional usage, as a part
of an official or professional dress, the latter especially in
England by judges and barristers.

2. An old seal; -- so called by fishermen. Wig tree. (Bot.) See Smoke
tree, under Smoke.

WIG
Wig, v. t. [imp. & p. p. Wigged; p. pr. & vb. n. Wigging.]

Defn: To censure or rebuke; to hold up to reprobation; to scold.
[Slang]

WIGAN
Wig"an, n.

Defn: A kind of canvaslike cotton fabric, used to stiffen and protect
the lower part of trousers and of the skirts of women's dresses,
etc.; -- so called from Wigan, the name of a town in Lancashire,
England.

WIGEON
Wi"geon, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: A widgeon. [R.]

WIGG; WIG
Wigg, Wig, n. Etym: [Cf. D. wegge a sort of bread, G. weck, orig., a
wedge-shaped loaf or cake. See Wedge.]

Defn: A kind of raised seedcake. "Wiggs and ale." Pepys.

WIGGED
Wigged

Defn: , a. Having the head covered with a wig; wearing a wig.

WIGGERY
Wig"ger*y, n.

1. A wig or wigs; false hair. [R.] A. Trollope.

2. Any cover or screen, as red-tapism. [R.]
Fire peels the wiggeries away from them [facts.] Carlyle.

WIGGLE
Wig"gle, v. t. & i. Etym: [Cf. Wag, v. t., Waggle.]

Defn: To move to and fro with a quick, jerking motion; to bend
rapidly, or with a wavering motion, from side to side; to wag; to
squirm; to wriggle; as, the dog wiggles his tail; the tadpole wiggles
in the water. [Prov. Eng. & Colloq. U. S.]

WIGGLE
Wig"gle, n.

Defn: Act of wiggling; a wriggle. [Colloq.]

WIGGLER
Wig"gler, n. (Zoöl.)

Defn: The young, either larva or pupa, of the mosquito; -- called
also wiggletail.

WIGHER
Wig"her, v. i. Etym: [Cf. G. wiehern, E. whine.]

Defn: To neigh; to whinny. [Obs.] Beau. & Fl.

WIGHT
Wight, n.

Defn: Weight. [Obs.]

WIGHT
Wight, n. Etym: [OE. wight, wiht, a wight, a whit, AS. wiht, wuht, a
creature, a thing; skin to D. wicht a child, OS. & OHG. wiht a
creature, thing, G. wicht a creature, Icel. vætt a wight, vætt a
whit, Goth. waíhts, waíht, thing; cf. Russ. veshche a thing. Whit.]

1. A whit; a bit; a jot. [Obs.]
She was fallen asleep a little wight. Chaucer.

2. A supernatural being. [Obs.] Chaucer.

3. A human being; a person, either male or female; -- now used
chiefly in irony or burlesque, or in humorous language. "Worst of all
wightes." Chaucer.
Every wight that hath discretion. Chaucer.
Oh, say me true if thou wert mortal wight. Milton.

WIGHT
Wight, a. Etym: [OE. wight, wiht, probably of Scand. origin; cf.
Icel. vigr in fighting condition, neut. vigh war, akin to AS. wig See
Vanquish.]

Defn: Swift; nimble; agile; strong and active. [Obs. or Poetic]
'T is full wight, God wot, as is a roe. Chaucer.
He was so wimble and so wight. Spenser.
They were Night and Day, and Day and Night, Pilgrims wight with steps
forthright. Emerson.

WIGHTLY
Wight"ly, adv.

Defn: Swiftly; nimbly; quickly. [Obs.]

WIGLESS
Wig"less, a.

Defn: Having or wearing no wig.

WIGWAG
Wig"wag`, v. i. Etym: [See Wag, v. t.] (Naut.)

Defn: To signal by means of a flag waved from side to side according
to a code adopted for the purpose. [Colloq.]

WIGWAM
Wig"wam, n. Etym: [From the Algonquin or Massachusetts Indian word
wek, "his house," or "dwelling place;" with possessive and locative
affixes, we-kou-om-ut, "in his (or their) house," contracted by the
English to weekwam, and wigwam.]

Defn: An Indian cabin or hut, usually of a conical form, and made of
a framework of poles covered with hides, bark, or mats; -- called
also tepee. [Sometimes written also weekwam.]
Very spacious was the wigwam, Made of deerskin dressed and whitened,
With the gods of the Dacotahs Drawn and painted on its curtains.
Longfellow.

Note: "The wigwam, or Indian house, of a circular or oval shape, was
made of bark or mats laid over a framework of branches of trees stuck
in the ground in such a manner as to converge at the top, where was a
central aperture for the escape of smoke from the fire beneath. The
better sort had also a lining of mats. For entrance and egress, two
low openings were left on opposite sides, one or the other of which
was closed with bark or mats, according to the direction of the
wind." Palfrey.

WIKE
Wike, n.

Defn: A temporary mark or boundary, as a bough of a tree set up in
marking out or dividing anything, as tithes, swaths to be mowed in
common ground, etc.; -- called also wicker. [Prov. Eng.]

WIKE
Wike, n. Etym: [AS. wic. See Wick a village.]

Defn: A home; a dwelling. [Obs. or Prov. Eng.]

WIKIUP
Wik"i*up`, n. [Of North American Indian origin; cf. Dakota wakeya,
wokeya.]

Defn: The hut used by the nomadic Indian tribes of the arid regions
of the west and southwest United States, typically elliptical in
form, with a rough frame covered with reed mats or grass or
brushwood.

WIKKE
Wik"ke, a.

Defn: Wicked. [Obs.] Chaucer.

WILD
Wild, a. [Compar. Wilder; superl. Wildest.] Etym: [OE. wilde, AS.
wilde; akin to OFries. wilde, D. wild, OS. & OHG. wildi, G. wild, Sw.
& Dan. vild, Icel. villr wild, bewildered, astray, Goth. wilpeis
wild, and G. & OHG. wild game, deer; of uncertain origin.]

1. Living in a state of nature; inhabiting natural haunts, as the
forest or open field; not familiar with, or not easily approached by,
man; not tamed or domesticated; as, a wild boar; a wild ox; a wild
cat.
Winter's not gone yet, if the wild geese fly that way. Shak.

2. Growing or produced without culture; growing or prepared without
the aid and care of man; native; not cultivated; brought forth by
unassisted nature or by animals not domesticated; as, wild parsnip,
wild camomile, wild strawberry, wild honey.
The woods and desert caves, With wild thyme and gadding vine
o'ergrown. Milton.

3. Desert; not inhabited or cultivated; as, wild land. "To trace the
forests wild." Shak.

4. Savage; uncivilized; not refined by culture; ferocious; rude; as,
wild natives of Africa or America.

5. Not submitted to restraint, training, or regulation; turbulent;
tempestuous; violent; ungoverned; licentious; inordinate; disorderly;
irregular; fanciful; imaginary; visionary; crazy. "Valor grown wild
by pride." Prior. "A wild, speculative project." Swift.
What are these So withered and so wild in their attire Shak.
With mountains, as with weapons, armed; which makes Wild work in
heaven. Milton.
The wild winds howl. Addison.
Search then the ruling passion, there, alone The wild are constant,
and the cunning known. Pope.

6. Exposed to the wind and sea; unsheltered; as, a wild roadstead.

7. Indicating strong emotion, intense excitement, or as, a wild look.

8. (Naut.)

Defn: Hard to steer; -- said of a vessel.

Note: Many plants are named by prefixing wild to the names of other
better known or cultivated plants to which they a bear a real or
fancied resemblance; as, wild allspice, wild pink, etc. See the
Phrases below.

To run wild, to go unrestrained or untamed; to live or untamed; to
live or grow without culture or training.
 -- To sow one's wild oats. See under Oat. Wild allspice. (Bot.),
spicewood.
 -- Wild balsam apple (Bot.), an American climbing cucurbitaceous
plant (Echinocystis lobata).
 -- Wild basil (Bot.), a fragrant labiate herb (Calamintha
Clinopodium) common in Europe and America.
 -- Wild bean (Bot.), a name of several leguminous plants, mostly
species of Phaseolus and Apios.
 -- Wild bee (Zoöl.), any one of numerous species of undomesticated
social bees, especially the domestic bee when it has escaped from
domestication and built its nest in a hollow tree or among rocks.
 -- Wild bergamot. (Bot.) See under Bergamot.
 -- Wild boar (Zoöl.), the European wild hog (Sus scrofa), from which
the common domesticated swine is descended.
 -- Wild brier (Bot.), any uncultivated species of brier. See Brier.
 -- Wild bugloss (Bot.), an annual rough-leaved plant (Lycopsis
arvensis) with small blue flowers.
 -- Wild camomile (Bot.), one or more plants of the composite genus
Matricaria, much resembling camomile.
 -- Wild cat. (Zoöl.) (a) A European carnivore (Felis catus) somewhat
resembling the domestic cat, but larger stronger, and having a short
tail. It is destructive to the smaller domestic animals, such as
lambs, kids, poultry, and the like. (b) The common American lynx, or
bay lynx. (c) (Naut.) A wheel which can be adjusted so as to revolve
either with, or on, the shaft of a capstan. Luce.
 -- Wild celery. (Bot.) See Tape grass, under Tape.
 -- Wild cherry. (Bot.) (a) Any uncultivated tree which bears
cherries. The wild red cherry is Prunus Pennsylvanica. The wild black
cherry is P. serotina, the wood of which is much used for
cabinetwork, being of a light red color and a compact texture. (b)
The fruit of various species of Prunus.
 -- Wild cinnamon. See the Note under Canella.
 -- Wild comfrey (Bot.), an American plant (Cynoglossum Virginicum)
of the Borage family. It has large bristly leaves and small blue
flowers.
 -- Wild cumin (Bot.), an annual umbelliferous plant (Lagoecia
cuminoides) native in the countries about the Mediterranean.
 -- Wild drake (Zoöl.) the mallard.
 -- Wild elder (Bot.), an American plant (Aralia hispida) of the
Ginseng family.
 -- Wild fowl (Zoöl.) any wild bird, especially any of those
considered as game birds.
 -- Wild goose (Zoöl.), any one of several species of undomesticated
geese, especially the Canada goose (Branta Canadensis), the European
bean goose, and the graylag. See Graylag, and Bean goose, under Bean.
 -- Wild goose chase, the pursuit of something unattainable, or of
something as unlikely to be caught as the wild goose. Shak.
 -- Wild honey, honey made by wild bees, and deposited in trees,
rocks, the like.
 -- Wild hyacinth. (Bot.) See Hyacinth, 1 (b). Wild Irishman (Bot.),
a thorny bush (Discaria Toumatou) of the Buckthorn family, found in
New Zealand, where the natives use the spines in tattooing.
 -- Wild land. (a) Land not cultivated, or in a state that renders it
unfit for cultivation. (b) Land which is not settled and cultivated.
 -- Wild licorice. (Bot.) See under Licorice.
 -- Wild mammee (Bot.), the oblong, yellowish, acid fruit of a
tropical American tree (Rheedia lateriflora); -- so called in the
West Indies.
 -- Wild marjoram (Bot.), a labiate plant (Origanum vulgare) much
like the sweet marjoram, but less aromatic.
 -- Wild oat. (Bot.) (a) A tall, oatlike kind of soft grass
(Arrhenatherum avenaceum). (b) See Wild oats, under Oat.
 -- Wild pieplant (Bot.), a species of dock (Rumex hymenosepalus)
found from Texas to California. Its acid, juicy stems are used as a
substitute for the garden rhubarb.
 -- Wild pigeon. (Zoöl.) (a) The rock dove. (b) The passenger pigeon.
 -- Wild pink (Bot.), an American plant (Silene Pennsylvanica) with
pale, pinkish flowers; a kind of catchfly.
 -- Wild plantain (Bot.), an arborescent endogenous herb (Heliconia
Bihai), much resembling the banana. Its leaves and leaf sheaths are
much used in the West Indies as coverings for packages of
merchandise.
 -- Wild plum. (Bot.) (a) Any kind of plum growing without
cultivation. (b) The South African prune. See under Prune.
 -- Wild rice. (Bot.) See Indian rice, under Rice.
 -- Wild rosemary (Bot.), the evergreen shrub Andromeda polifolia.
See Marsh rosemary, under Rosemary.
 -- Wild sage. (Bot.) See Sagebrush.
 -- Wild sarsaparilla (Bot.), a species of ginseng (Aralia
nudicaulis) bearing a single long-stalked leaf.
 -- Wild sensitive plant (Bot.), either one of two annual leguminous
herbs (Cassia Chamæcrista, and C. nictitans), in both of which the
leaflets close quickly when the plant is disturbed.
 -- Wild service.(Bot.) See Sorb.
 -- Wild Spaniard (Bot.), any one of several umbelliferous plants of
the genus Aciphylla, natives of New Zealand. The leaves bear numerous
bayonetlike spines, and the plants form an impenetrable thicket.
 -- Wild turkey. (Zoöl.) See 2d Turkey.